<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89406-0112 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.4-06-89.f2.A1111</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4> Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 65 / Thursday, April 6, 1989/ Notices <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Social Security Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Demonstration Grants; Announcement of Fiscal Year (FY) 1989 ResearchDemonstration Program (RDP), Availability of Grant Funds and Request forApplications  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Social Security Administration (SSA)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Announcement of the availability of FY I989 funds andrequest for applications under SSA's RDP. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>In FY 1987, SSA announced the beginning of its RDP. Thecurrent announcement pertains to SSA's RDP for FY 1989 and consists offour sections:andbullet; Section I provides background information, discusses the purposeof the RDP, lists funding authorities and briefly describes the applicationprocess. andbullet; Section II describes the programmatic priorities and subprioritiesunder which SSA is requesting applications for funding. andbullet; Section III describes in detail the application process. andbullet; Section IV provides guidance on how to prepare and submit an application.All of the forms and instructions necessary to submit an application arepublished as part of this announcement following section IV. Therefore,no separate application kit is needed for submitting an application. Theclosing date for submission of applications is June 5, 1989. (See SectionIII, I.)<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> For purposes of this announcement, SSA is using the SocialSecurity Disability Insurance (DI) program terms ``beneficiary'' and ``benefit''to also represent the Supplemental Security Income (SSI) Program terms``recipient'' and ``payment.''</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Social Security Administration,Division of Disability Program Information and Studies, 6401 Security Boulevard,Room 2223 Annex Building, Baltimore, Maryland 21235, Telephone: (301) 965-0105.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Section I_Preamble </ITAG>A. Goals of the Social Security Administration (SSA) A major goal of SSA is to assist Social Security disability insurance (DI)and Supplemental Security Income (SSI) disabled and blind beneficiarieswho have the potential to return to work. SSA is seeking to test new approachesto achieve this goal. These include more effective and efficient use ofavailable vocational rehabilitation (VR) and other employment services,and new work incentives (WI). SSA's focus is on significantly improved integration and use of VR andother employment program resources for its beneficiaries. This reflectsa national concern with assisting disabled persons to become more productivecontributors to the economy, while enhancing their self-esteem. SSA wishesto directly achieve this goal and is seeking to test new approaches which,if successful, can lead to the introduction of effective policies and programsof employment services for its beneficiary populations throughout the country.One of SSA's highest priorities for achieving these goals is to help andassure that as many beneficiaries as possible return to work at a levelof earnings that will end or reduce dependency on SSA's disability programs.Currently, there are about 4.1 million disabled (and blind) beneficiarieson the DI rolls, and about 3 million disabled and blind on the SSI rolls.Total costs in payments to DI and SSI blind and disabled in 1987 (the latestyear such figures are available) were 28.4 billion dollars. Over the years,most persons coming onto the rolls have remained there. However, surveysand interviews of current beneficiaries indicate that many want to workand would return to work if the conditions were favorable. This might includeconditions such as: an accommodating employer; assistance in finding anew position; encouragement and support; skills enhancement; transportation;alternative coverage of customary medical costs; various economic incentives;a longer trial work period (TWP) (e.g., for transitional employment); orsome degree of medical improvement/rehabilitation leading to employment.SSA is seeking projects designed to make the most effective and efficientuse of existing rehabilitation and employment service programs and systems,and for the creative application of available resources and technologiesto assist beneficiaries to return to work. These projects should clearlycontribute to SSA's employment priorities including: andbullet; Information that will lead to programmatic changes to systematicallyincrease the number of beneficiaries who return to work; andbullet; Methods of linking beneficiaries with employment assistance thatfeature cost-effective, state-of-the-art techniques; andbullet; More efficient and effective mechanisms for identifying and referringcandidates for rehabilitation and employment services; andbullet; Increased access by beneficiaries to employment service systemsand networks; andbullet; More effective and efficient employment intervention for beneficiaries;and andbullet; More effective incentives for rehabilitation and employment. B. Research Demonstration Program (RDP) of SSA The RDP is designed to coordinate several funding authorities and to serveas SSA's major demonstration effort on behalf of both the DI and SSI disabledand blind populations in a single <T4>Federal Register </T4>announcement. This nationwide competition toselect demonstration projects designed to stimulate, test and coordinateeffective approaches toward  employment assistance is part of an innovativeand systematic SSA-wide initiative for assisting beneficiaries to enterthe workforce or return to work. SSA anticipates funding projects in the last quarter of FY 1989 or thefirst quarter of FY 1990. SSA anticipates funding up to 40 demonstrationgrants totaling about 5 million dollars, subject to availability of funds.In general, demonstration activities are intended to add to existing knowledgeand to improve methods and techniques. Priority areas in this announcementrequest innovative demonstrations which extend and enhance employment outcomesfor DI and SSI beneficiaries, including approaches which fill gaps in existingprograms, link programs with public and private sector employment services,or create and test entirely new mechanisms to assist beneficiaries to secureemployment. Applications which replicate existing employment strategiesare not being sought, unless these ideas include a major new componentor a new combination or enhancement of existing components which will leadto significant improvement in employment outcomes for DI and SSI beneficiaries.Priority will be placed on selection of approaches that offer the maximumopportunity for placement of SSA beneficiaries in permanent, competitivejobs, are cost-effective, can be replicated, and improve methods for coordinatingemployment opportunities for SSA's disability populations. In addition to these concerns, SSA wishes to pursue demonstrations suggestedin the report of the Disability Advisory Council (DAC). The DAC was mandatedby section 12102 of Pub. L. 99-272 to study and make recommendations relatedto the effectiveness of VR services for DI and SSI beneficiaries, the useof specialists for medical/vocational evaluations, and possible criteriafor assessing the probability that an applicant or recipient of disabilitybenefits might benefit from rehabilitation services. The DAC was charteredby the Secretary of Health and Human Services on July 3, 1986, and itsfinal report was transmitted to Congress and the Board of Trustees of theDisability Insurance trust fund on March 11, 1988. The DAC heard testimony from many experts in VR, medical/work evaluations,Social Security policy, and the economic implications of SSA's disabilityprograms. After more than a year of study, the DAC concluded that SSA shouldfurther emphasize return to work as the appropriate goal of SSA's VR effortsand that SSA needs to develop additional ways to get many more of its disabilitybeneficiaries into VR and programs leading to permanent employment. Indeveloping new VR/employment strategies, the DAC recommended that SSA conductdemonstrations, using all available sources of VR services (both publicand private) and emphasizing case management and client/counselor cooperationto achieve maximum efficiency and effectiveness in returning disabilitybeneficiaries to employment. Many of these recommendations are reflectedin the specific demonstration topics requested under the priority areasin this announcement, including: andbullet; The active participation of beneficiaries in establishing VR/employmentgoals and selective source providers;andbullet; Employer involvement in the design and structure of job skillstraining programs and worksite accommodations;andbullet; Use of case managers to oversee the planning and provision ofservices and to provide ongoing cost management and quality control;andbullet; Use of compatible systems for reporting services and measuringthe cost effectiveness of these services;andbullet; Development of incentives which promote early return to work;andbullet; Testing effective and efficient methods to identify and referbeneficiaries for appropriate VR/employment services; and andbullet; Information campaigns about SSA's work incentives aimed at SSAand other public employees, community-based groups, parents of disabledchildren, and others who are involved with disabled persons. SSA is particularly interested in approaches that: (a) Link the resourcesof Federal and State agencies serving DI or SSI beneficiaries; (b) linkthe resources of Federal, State, and private agencies; (c) link SSA programswith private employers or employer associations possibly including PrivateIndustry Councils; (d) link Federal and/or State resources with privatesector organizations serving the disabled; and/or (e) promote additionalprivate sector involvement with DI and SSI beneficiaries, e.g., directjob development and placement of beneficiaries or innovative uses of rehabilitationengineering techniques to return beneficiaries to the workforce. C. Legislative Authorities  Authority for this activity is contained in sections 702 and 1110(a) ofthe Social Security Act (the Act), for projects to promote economic securityand reduced dependency; section 1110(b) of the Act, for projects that assistin promoting the objectives or facilitate the administration of the SSIprogram; and section 505(a) of Public Law (Pub. L.) 96-265, for projectsto improve employment outcomes for DI beneficiaries. In addition, section505(a) of Pub. L. 96-265, as extended by Pub. L. 99-272, section 12101,requires the Secretary of HHS to test new forms of rehabilitation and otheremployment-related initiatives that will help DI beneficiaries return towork. It should be noted that certain of these authorities contain the flexibilityto waive provisions of the Act to test new employment service arrangementsand WI on a demonstration basis. Specifically, section 505(a)(3) authorizesthe Secretary to waive titles II (DI) and XVIII (Medicare) benefit restrictions.Additionally, section 1110(b) authorizes the Secretary to waive requirements,conditions or limitations of title XVI (SSI), subject to certain safeguardssuch as voluntary participation by SSI recipients. The waiver authorityunder both titles has been redelegated by the Secretary to the Commissionerof SSA. However, section 505(a) requires that ``no experiment or project shallbe actually placed in operation unless at least 90 days prior thereto awritten report, prepared for purposes of notification and information only,and containing a full and complete description thereof, has been transmittedby the Secretary to the Committee on Ways and Means of the House of Representativesand to the Committee on Finance of the Senate.'' Additional processingtime will be required to fulfill this requirement. D. Competitive Review of Applications Applications received under this announcement will be reviewed competitivelyagainst the evaluation criteria of this announcement (see section III)by qualified independent reviewers. SSA will use these evaluations as anelement in the selection process. The results of this review will assistSSA in deciding which applications should receive funding. E. Background<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Definition of Disability </ITAG>SSA administers two programs (DI and SSI) for the disabled, as well asa separate SSI program for the blind. (The DI program for the disabledcovers disabled blind.) Under both title II and title XVI, the definitions of disability and blindnessare essentially the same. The law defines disability as ``the inabilityto engage in <T3>any </T3>substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinablephysical or mental impairment which can be expected to result in deathor has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of notless than 12 months * * * '' To meet the basic definition of disability,a person must have a severe impairment which makes him/her not only unableto do previous work but, considering the person's age, education, and workexperience, any other substantial gainful work which exists in significantnumbers in the national economy. There is a separate statutory definitionof blindness for the SSI blind program. To qualify for DI benefits on his or her own earnings record, a disabledperson must meet the definition of disability, and also meet an ``insuredstatus'' requirement (sufficient past work in Social Security covered employment).To qualify for SSI benefits a disabled or blind person must meet the definitionof disability or blindness and also meet certain other eligibility requirements,including an income and resources (financial need) test. New DI beneficiaries must wait 5 months from the onset of disability toreceive cash benefits, and another 24 months to qualify for Medicare benefits.A waiting period is not required for new SSI beneficiaries to qualify forcash benefits and Medicaid benefits (in those States that provide Medicaidbased on SSI eligibility).With certain exceptions, DI benefits generally continue until death orage 65 unless the beneficiary medically improves or performs substantialgainful activity (SGA). See Section I.E.5. for a more thorough descriptionof SSA's current VR program. Ordinarily SSA considers a person to be performingSGA when his or her earnings (excluding subsidies and certain impairment-relatedwork expenses) average more than $300 per month ($740 for blind DI beneficiarieswho are subject to different rules). SSI benefits generally continue until death with no age cut-off unlessthe beneficiary medically improves or ceases to meet other eligibilityrequirements, such as the income and resources test. SGA is not a factorfor SSI beneficiaries who perform work after entitlement (see Section I.E.4.,Work Incentives). <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Determination of Disability </ITAG>While SSA's disability programs are federally administered and funded,State agencies, generically known as disability determination services(DDSs) are used to determine disability and blindness. Thirty-seven ofthese DDSs operate under a State vocational rehabilitation agency (VRA).The remainder operate under a State umbrella agency, under a welfare agencyor as an independent State agency. Social Security regulations provide a five-step sequential evaluation processwhich is used in determining whether a claimant meets the legal definitionof disability. (See Section I.E.3. for a separate description of the sequentialevaluation process for continuing disability reviews.) When a decisionthat an individual is or is not disabled can be made at any step, evaluationunder subsequent steps is not necessary. In this way, an eligibility decisionfor a claim is made as quickly and efficiently as possible. The first consideration, except for the SSI blind who are not subject toan SGA standard, is whether the applicant is performing SGA. If a DI orSSI applicant is performing SGA, his/her claim will be denied.Second, the individual's medical condition is considered to determine whetherhis/her impairment(s) has more than a minimal effect on the individual'sability(ies) to perform basic work-related functions such as walking, lifting,and following simple instructions. If the impairment(s) does not imposesuch a restriction on physical or mental capacities, the claim is deniedfor lack of necessary severity. Next, if the individual is not performing SGA and has an impairment whichhas more than a minimal effect on the individual's ability(ies) to performwork-related functions, the individual's medical condition is comparedwith the criteria set forth in SSA's Listing of Impairments in the SocialSecurity regulations. If the impairment(s) meets the listed criteria, oris medically equivalent to those criteria, the claim is allowed withoutfurther evaluation. If a claim has not been decided at any of the earlier steps in the sequentialevaluation process, the individual's ability to perform work-related physicaland mental activities is determined based on all of the relevant medicalevidence and may include descriptions of limitations that go beyond thesymptoms that are important in the diagnosis and treatment of a claimant'smedical condition. This determination of residual functional capacity (RFC)is then compared with the demands of his/her past work. If the individualretains the capacity to perform work done in the past, the claim is denied.A claim that cannot be decided at this step in the process is further evaluatedto determine whether the individual can perform work other than past work.In making this determination, the individual's age, education, and workexperience are considered, as well as RFC. This is only a general description of the sequential evaluation processfor determining disability. The sequential evaluation process does notapply in full to DI claims for widows, widowers, or surviving divorcedspouses, or to SSI claims for children under age 18. To be eligible underthe criteria in the law, these claimants must have an impairment(s) whichis so severe that it meets (or is equivalent to) the medical criteria inthe Listing of Impairments. Also, blindness determinations for SSI claimantsare based on medical criteria prescribed by statute and do not follow thesequential evaluation process. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Continuing Disability Review Process </ITAG>SSA is required by law to periodically determine whether a beneficiarycontinues to be disabled and otherwise eligible for benefits. Since 1984,these continuing disability reviews (CDRs) have been conducted subjectto a medical improvement review standard. Under this standard generally,once an individual is receiving disability benefits, substantial evidencemust show that medical improvement related to his/her ability to work hasoccurred and that the person is able to work (i.e., perform SGA) beforeSSA can determine that the person is no longer eligible to receive benefits.The law, however, provides for certain limited situations when a beneficiary'sdisability can be found to have ended, even though medical improvementhas not occurred. The medical improvement review standard also applies to cases involvingdisabled widow(er)s, disabled surviving divorced spouses and disabled SSIchildren under age 18. <T3>Overview of the CDR Process. </T3>In general, the frequency of CDRsdepends on the type of case involved. Cases identified at the time of theinitial decision as being likely to improve (medical improvement expected(MIE) cases) are usually scheduled to be reviewed within 18 months afterthe initial decision. Cases in which disability is not permanent (medicalimprovement possible (MIP) cases) are scheduled to be reviewed at leastonce every 3 years. Cases in which the disability is expected to be permanent(medical improvement not expected (MINE) cases) are scheduled to be reviewedevery 5 to 7 years. CDRs can also be conducted at any time if SSA learnsthat a beneficiary may have medically recovered. In title II return to work cases, a CDR is conducted:andbullet; Immediately, in an MIE case, since the work may indicate thatthe expected medical improvement has occurred; andbullet; Immediately, in an MIP or MINE case if medical recovery is alleged;and andbullet; At the end of the 9-month TWP in MIP or MINE cases in which medicalrecovery is not alleged. In title XVI return to work cases, work itself is not a reason for cessation,but medical CDRs are required following certain status changes under section1619(b). In addition, a medical review is required following eligibilityunder section 1619 (a) or (b). Eligibility will cease only if there ismedical improvement. Most CDRs begin in an SSA field office (FO), after the beneficiary is notifiedof the CDR. During a personal contact, the FO advises the individual ofhis/her rights and responsibilities, obtains information and evidence onthe individual's current condition and sources of medical treatment, andrequests permission to contact these sources. After the interview, theFO generally sends the beneficiary's medical folder to the State DDS fora determination. If the DDS examiner-physician team determines that the individual is nolonger entitled to disability benefits, it sends a notice to the beneficiary.The notice explains why the DDS reached its decision and advises the beneficiaryof appeal rights, including the right to elect to have benefits continuedif he or she decides to appeal the decision. <T3>Sequential Evaluation Process for CDRs. </T3>As with initial claims,the regulations require that an orderly adjudication process, known asthe sequential evaluation process be used to determine whether an individualcontinues to be disabled. However, the sequential evaluation process forCDRs differs from the process used for initial claims which was describedin Section I.E.2. The CDR sequential evaluation process includes additionalsteps so that it can be determined if medical improvement related to theability to work has  occurred. In addition, some of the steps in the CDRsequential evaluation process have been adopted from the initial process,but they are in a different order. There is a sequential evaluation process that applies to a person receivingDI benefits as a worker or childhood disability beneficiary or receivingSSI disability or blindness payments as an adult. However, the sequentialevaluation process is modified to reflect the different definition of disabilitythat is applied to disabled widow(er)s, disabled surviving divorced spousesand disabled SSI children under age l8 (i.e., it is based on whether theindividual continues to have an impairment that meets or equals the levelof severity in the Listing of Impairments and does not consider vocationalfactors of age, education and work experience). <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Work Incentives </ITAG>Prior to 1980, there were few WI for DI or SSI beneficiaries. The SocialSecurity Disability Amendments of 1980 (Pub. L. 96-265) added some newincentives. The Employment Opportunities for Disabled Americans Act, Pub.L. 99-643, liberalized some of these incentives for SSI beneficiaries effectiveJuly 1, 1987, and the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987, Pub. L.100-203, added still additional DI incentives effective January 1, 1988.Major DI WI for beneficiaries who do not medically improve include: andbullet; A 9-month TWP and a 3-month grace period for individuals who work:This offers a disabled beneficiary an opportunity to test his/her abilityto work without losing benefits. Under this provision, the beneficiaryis credited with a month of work for each month that earnings exceed 75dollars (or 15 hours of work for the self-employed). When the beneficiaryhas accumulated 9 such months (not necessarily consecutive), the TWP iscompleted. After the TWP, SSA will determine whether the work the individualperformed during the TWP was SGA. If SSA determines that the individualis no longer disabled, the beneficiary will receive benefits for the monthdisability ceases and at least the next 2 months (the 3 month ``grace period'').andbullet; A 36-month reentitlement period: This provision provides a reentitlement period for disabled persons whocomplete a TWP and continue to have a disabling impairment. It is not anextension of the TWP, but rather a period during which benefits can bereinstated without need for a new application, disability determinationor waiting period if the person's work falls below the SGA level. andbullet; An extension of Medicare coverage: Medicare coverage for DI beneficiaries who have not medically recoveredwill continue for 39 months following the end of the TWP or until the lastmonth of payment of disability benefits, whichever is later. For individualswhose disability benefit entitlement ends for reasons other than SGA, Medicarecoverage ends at the same time disability benefits end.andbullet; Elimination of second waiting period for Medicare for people whobecome reentitled to disability benefits based on the same medical condition:Prior to 1988, a worker who became entitled to DI benefits more than 5years after his/her previous entitlement to DI benefits terminated (ora disabled widow(er) or childhood disability beneficiary who became entitledto disability benefits more than 7 years after his/her previous entitlementfor disability benefits terminated) had to serve another 24-month waitingperiod before Medicare coverage could begin. Now, a person who becomesreentitled to DI benefits on the basis of an impairment that is the sameor directly related to the impairment that was the basis for the previousentitlement that ended on or after February 29, 1988, does not have toserve another 24-month waiting period for Medicare benefits; months inthe previous period of disability count toward the 24-month waiting period.andbullet; Deduction of certain impairment-related work expenses. The cost of certain impairment-related items and services that a personneeds in order to work can be deducted from earnings in determinationsof SGA, even if these items and services are also needed for non-work activities.The person must not have been nor expect to be reimbursed for the expenses.Major SSI WI for beneficiaries who do not medically improve now include:andbullet; Section 1619(a)_Special SSI Payments: This incentive allows special SSI cash payments to disabled persons onthe rolls, in place of their regular SSI payments when their earnings areat the amount ordinarily designated as the SGA level. (It does not applyto blind SSI recipients.) To qualify for this incentive, the person mustcontinue to have the original disabling impairment under which eligibilityfor SSI was initially determined and currently meet all other eligibilityrules including the income and resources tests. People who receive special SSI cash benefits keep their disability statusuntil they are determined to have medically improved or are terminatedfor a non-disability-related reason(s). If the earnings of a person receivingspecial SSI cash benefits drops below the SGA level, the individual willbe paid regular SSI benefits if all other eligibility requirements aremet. Individuals who receive special SSI cash benefits are SSI recipientsfor all purposes, including Medicaid eligibility determinations. Underthe special rules, the individual's payment amount is still calculatedin the same way as regular SSI cash benefits (e.g., as earnings rise, theSSI benefit is reduced according to a formula). andbullet; Section 1619(b)_Recipient Status for Medicaid This incentive is important because it protects Medicaid benefits (if theState provides Medicaid coverage to SSI eligibles) when income is too highfor cash payments but not high enough to replace the loss of Medicaid.This incentive continues Medicaid coverage for working disabled or blindpeople under age 65 when their income becomes high enough to cause SSIcash benefits or federally-administered State supplementary payments tostop. To qualify for extended Medicaid coverage under section 1619(b),a person must: _Continue to have a disabling condition or continue to be blind; _Need Medicaid in order to continue to work; _Be unable to afford benefits equivalent to the SSI federally-administeredState supplementary payments, Medicaid coverage and publicly funded attendantcare services (including personal care assistance) the person would beeligible for if he/she were not working; and _Meet all non-disability requirements for SSI payment other than earnings.andbullet; Plan for Achieving Self-Support (PASS) PASS can help an individual establish or maintain SSI eligibility and canalso increase the individual's SSI payment amount. It allows a disabledor blind person to set aside income and/or resources for a specified periodof time for a work goal such as education, vocational training, startinga business, or the purchase of work-related equipment. A plan is for SSIbenefits only and does <T3>not </T3>affect an SGA determination. Income and resources that areset aside are excluded only under the SSI income and resources test. The individual must have a feasible work goal, a specific savings/spendingplan, and must provide for a clearly identifiable accounting for the fundswhich are set aside. The plan must be in writing and have a specific timeframe.andbullet; Impairment-Related Work Expenses (IRWE) The cost of certain impairment-related services and items that a personneeds in order to work can be deducted from earnings in determinationsof SGA, even if these items and services are also needed for nonwork activities.IRWE are also excluded from earned income in determining an SSI recipient'smonthly payment amount. However, individuals must first establish FederalSSI eligibility without the IRWE exclusion. andbullet; Blind Work Expenses (BWE) Any earned income of a blind person which is used to meet any expensesreasonably attributable to earning the income is not counted in determiningSSI eligibility and payment amount if the blind person is under age 65;or age 65 or older and received SSI payments due to blindness (or receivedpayments under a former State plan for aid to the blind) for the monthbefore he/she attained age 65. A BWE need not relate directly to an individual'sblindness; it need only be a work-related expense of the individual. For beneficiaries who have medically improved and are no longer considereddisabled by SSA, section 301 of Pub. L. 96-265 provides for a continuationof DI and SSI benefits if the individual is participating in an approvedState VR plan at the time disability ceases. Eligibility for continuedbenefit payments is determined based on whether participation in the StateVR program will increase the likelihood of permanent removal from the disabilityrolls.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">5. Current SSA VR ProgramSSA's VR program generally operates as follows:andbullet; SSA's FOs alert new disability or blindness applicants that theymight be referred to a State VRA. SSA now uses only State VRAs to providereimbursable VR services. andbullet; The State DDSs, the agencies that collect the medical informationand make SSA's disability and blindness determinations, screen claims forpossible VR referrals in conjunction with determining whether the applicantsare disabled or blind. The DDS screening for VR is a manual process, generallycarried out by disability examiners, using gross screening criteria andrelying on medical and vocational information collected for purposes ofdetermining disability or blindness. Generally, no special informationis gathered for VR assessment. andbullet; DDSs refer selected disability or blindness applicants (both beneficiariesand non-beneficiaries) to State VRAs. DDSs provide copies of the disabilityor blindness determination and relevant medical and vocational informationto the State VRAs. andbullet; The State VRAs decide which of the DDS referrals appear to begood candidates for VR and should be contacted. Disability beneficiarieswho apply to these agencies for VR are subject to the same standards ofeligibility as others served by the agencies. Those who are determinedeligible for VR are substantively and consensually involved in the developmentof an ``individualized written rehabilitation program [plan].'' State VReligibility and service decisions are based on the Rehabilitation Act of1973. andbullet; SSA reimburses the State VRAs for the costs of certain VR servicesprovided to DI and SSI beneficiaries. With certain exceptions, reimbursementmay be made only for those VR services that result in beneficiaries performingSGA for a continuous period of 9 months. <ITAG tagnum="84">Section II_Priority Areas</ITAG>In developing the priority areas for the FY 1989 RDP, SSA has reviewedand updated the critical needs of its disability programs based on:andbullet; Suggestions by rehabilitation and employment professionals; andbullet; Recommendations from SSA's central and regional offices;andbullet; Results of prior research and demonstration activities; andbullet; Grant awards made under the FY 1987 and FY 1988 RDP; and andbullet; Recommendations from the DAC. The current critical needs of SSA's program to help beneficiaries who haveability to work include: andbullet; Early intervention; andbullet; Rapid assessment; andbullet; Improved coordinated referral; and andbullet; Management of service provision that is cost-effective in achievingsustained employment outcome. The priorities that follow focus primarily on employment assistance. Whereverstated in the announcement ``competitive employment'' refers to employmentat or above the SGA level after any deduction(s) for subsidy and/or impairment-relatedwork expenses (see section I.E.4.). In reviewing proposals, SSA will alsoconsider proposed WI features (e.g., extension of TWP) that are potentiallycost-effective and administratively feasible on a demonstration basis andthat are proposed using methods that will effectively measure their impact.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Because new WI affect the structure of SSA's disabilityprograms and have major policy and cost implications, testing of new WIgenerally must be carried out on a sufficient scale and using appropriateexperimental designs, to assure that findings are representative, can begeneralized, and provide definitive information on impact. Additionally,WI involving benefit adjustments cannot be tested without manipulationof SSA's benefit records, thus such tests require SSA management. Thisincludes testing of a benefit offset (reduction of benefits based on earnings).</ITAG>SSA recognizes that the scope of work of any single application may addressaspects of several of the priority or subpriority areas listed. In selectingthe one priority and subpriority area under which your proposal will bereviewed, please select the single priority or subpriority area which mostclosely matches the overall purpose of the project being proposed. SSAwill not assist applicants in making this selection. Subpriority/priorityareas ending with the word ``Research'' (5.1 and 9, in part) are intendedto be research projects as contrasted with demonstration projects. Granteematching or cost-sharing requirements differ for research and demonstrationprojects. (See section III.C.) The programmatic priority areas of SSA's RDP are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 1: Job Placement Programs In Collaboration With Employers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 2: Improved Communication About Work Incentives andVocational/Employment Information  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 3: Employment Projects Targeting Special BeneficiaryPopulations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 4: Employment Strategies for Persons in Transition RequiringServices to Return to Work </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 5: Payment Models for Vocational Rehabilitation andEmployment Services </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 6: Use of Employment Provider Networks for ManagingReturn to Work Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 7: Employment and Training Demonstrations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 8: State Vocational Rehabilitation Program Demonstrations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 9: Non-Designated Projects</ITAG>Descriptions of Priorityand Subpriority Areas <ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_ Area 1: Job Placement Programs in Collaboration with Employers</ITAG>Based on evidence from a number of prior projects, SSA believes that employerscan become more directly involved in placing Social Security disabled beneficiaries(including SSI recipients) into permanent jobs. The overall goal of projectsin this priority area is to demonstrate efficient and effective methodsto obtain job placements. SSA seeks to demonstrate job placement projects involving direct cooperationbetween SSA and employers, employer associations, or labor unions; or,collaborations of these organizations with third parties, such as privateinsurers and public or private rehabilitation organizations. The goal ofprojects in this area is permanent job placements using innovative andreplicable employment models. Projects can involve replicable methods forefficient direct placement of Social Security disability beneficiariesor techniques that include a period of training followed by permanent jobplacement. Any training must be done by or directly with employers, oremployer-related groups committed to permanently hiring or placing SSA'sdisabled beneficiaries. All projects not directly sponsored by employersmust show links to companies making a clear commitment to train, hire andintegrate qualified beneficiaries into their workforces. In order to place beneficiaries permanently, it might be necessary to enablethem to try out their capacity for competitive employment through short-termor temporary jobs in real work settings or even in the home, provided suchwork leads to permanent competitive work opportunities. Projects involvingtemporary jobs can use non-employer resources, such as existing State andlocal VRAs, other rehabilitation organizations, rehabilitation engineeringtechniques and special transportation arrangements. Also, projects canbe based on innovative funding methods, involving coordination with privateinsurance funded rehabilitation services, methods to reduce employers'worker's compensation liability, current State or Federal tax credits foremploying the disabled and on-the-job training funds provided through theJob Training Partnership Act. Waiver of elements of SSA's TWP to permitjob training prior to permanent placement will be considered if requested.Such requests must demonstrate a familiarity with SSA's WI provisions (seesection I.E.3.) and must clearly show how a waiver is to be integratedinto the project. 1.1 <T3>Placement Projects Linking Beneficiaries Directly with Employers. </T3>SSArecognizes that many employers are usually unfamiliar with the provisionsand operation of the disability program and frequently are not aware ofthe WI provisions available to beneficiaries. And, employers typicallyare concerned with maintaining their workforces, filling job vacanciesand securing reliable and capable employees. In recent years, a small numberof employers have introduced disability management programs in an effortto control the costs of disability and rapidly assist impaired employeesto return to the active workforce. Other employers have experimented withhiring increased numbers of disabled workers to fill job openings, andin some instances, provided needed physical or equipment modificationsto permit the disabled person to function effectively in the work environment.There is, therefore, increasing evidence that employers can directly increasejob opportunities for the disabled although they may need assistance withreferral, recruitment, training and follow-up support for disabled employees.SSA also recognizes that there are public and private VR organizationswith established links to local employers who hire and train the disabled.In addition, many larger employers, employer associations and unions haveprograms to place their own disabled employees or union members in theirformer jobs (sometimes through job restructuring or rehabilitation engineering),to train such persons for different jobs in the same company or industry,or even to place disabled persons not formerly connected to the company,union or industry. However, these programs have only infrequently placedSocial Security disability beneficiaries in permanent, competitive jobs,and employers have not been able to easily locate beneficiaries or consistentlyprovide them with job placements. SSA is therefore interested in job placementprojects linked directly to employers and is prepared to award grants toemployers, employer associations, labor unions, etc., for the purpose oftraining and employing beneficiaries, provided this will lead to permanent,competitive employment at or above SGA levels. Such training could alsobe used to assure the placement of disabled beneficiaries who are illiterate,who do not speak or write English, or who are otherwise disadvantaged,where socioeconomic factors hinder them from obtaining retraining for jobsother than their past work, which they can no longer perform because oftheir medical impairment. In addition, SSA is interested in job training and placement projects administeredby private insurers or other public or private intermediary VR organizations,provided they are clearly linked with local employers who make commitmentsto hire and train SSA beneficiaries. Such projects may focus on methodsof: andbullet; Providing employers with information and support services whenthey hire disability beneficiaries to assure permanent employment;andbullet; Providing employers with assistance in training disabled beneficiariesto assume specific jobs in the organization; andbullet; Directly assisting employers in recruiting disabled beneficiariesto fill job openings; andbullet; Testing linkages between VR/employment service programs (includingschool systems) for the developmentally disabled and private employersproviding job and training commitments; or andbullet; Providing assistance to employers where technical modificationsto the work environment are needed so that beneficiaries can be employed.Organizations may propose using new or existing funding strategies, suchas PASS and section 1619 provisions (both for SSI recipients only), otherWIs, vouchers which beneficiaries could use to cover the costs of trainingand placement services with employers, and direct financial assistanceto employers to cover costs of health benefits, training and placementservices, as long as the strategy will result in disabled beneficiariesreturning to permanent, competitive employment. Projects must be designedto demonstrate replicable strategies and not focus on special or exceptionalcircumstances which are unique to an organization. 1.2 <T3>Employer-Based Projects Using Rehabilitation Engineering. </T3>SSAis seeking placement projects where rehabilitation engineering modificationsare needed to obtain employment and ensure that successful job performanceis obtained. Projects may be sponsored by employers, employer-related organizationsor other rehabilitation organizations with direct links to employers. Recentexperience has shown that both advances in high technology and innovativeapplications of ``low technology'' devices have assisted the disabled toreturn to work, but any devices must be integrated into the workplace environment,with the employer's full cooperation and understanding by the employer'sworkforce. The critical goal for such projects is permanent employmentat the SGA level or above. As in the previous subpriority area, the projectscan be administered by any public or private organization which can showlinkages to employers and a specific commitment by employers to employbeneficiaries. These projects should be designed to use existing rehabilitationengineering technology in directly assisting beneficiaries to obtain employment.And, projects must demonstrate the replication potential for obtainingemployment of beneficiaries through organizations linked with employerswhere rehabilitation engineering technology is essential to achieve jobplacement. 1.3 <T3>Employer-Based Projects with Specific Job Commitments. </T3>SSA isinterested in projects sponsored by large employers, employer associationsor unions, which include specific commitments of jobs for SSA's disabledbeneficiaries. The purpose of these projects is to demonstrate how SSAcould relate to employer sponsored job placement programs for disabledbeneficiaries which operate in local areas throughout the country. Replicableand cost-effective methods to use employer networks which can effectively,efficiently and consistently place beneficiaries in multiple localitiesare being sought. Such organizations must demonstrate their capabilityto train and place beneficiaries and their linkages with local providersof VR and employment services. Projects can involve employers' cooperationto rehire former employees who are disability beneficiaries and who mightrespond to a former employer's and SSA's joint interest to return to workunder favorable conditions or, projects can target disabled beneficiariesliving in the community. Use of SSA WIs and waivers of these provisionscan be considered for these projects. Also, innovative financing methodssuch as vouchers, direct payments for placements, performance payments,etc., should be considered. Projects could also involve creating job banksto hire former and non-former disabled employees. 1.4 <T3>Other Employer-Based or Employment-Focused Projects. </T3>SSA is alsointerested in other innovative projects linking beneficiaries with employers.These projects could involve ``intermediary'' rehabilitation or job developmentand placement organizations (both public and private) which could clearlydemonstrate efficient and cost-effective placement of beneficiaries intoprivate sector employment. Multiple methodologies could be tested, butessential features of these demonstrations must include: employer job commitments;linkages between employers and Social Security beneficiaries; opportunitiesfor job training where needed; and placement assistance and follow-up supportservices to assure job retention.<ITAG tagnum="15">Priority_Area 2: Improved Communication About Work Incentives andVocational Rehabilitation/Employment Information</ITAG>The Act contains a number of WI provisions designed to encourage beneficiarieswith disabilities to work (see section I.E.3.). However, these WIs havenot been broadly used by beneficiaries and often beneficiaries are reluctantto participate or continue in VR programs to achieve placement into employment.This raises concern about how effectively the WI provisions and VR/employmentprogram opportunities are being communicated to SSA's beneficiary populations.Based on studies conducted by SSA and recommendations of the DAC, we knowthat the success of SSA's WIs and VR/employment programs in large partdepends on: andbullet; The beneficiary population's awareness of their rights, obligationsand opportunities under the law; andbullet; The knowledge of SSA's field staff about WIs and available VR/employmentprograms and their effectiveness in providing accurate and timely responsesto claimant inquiries about the WI provisions and VR and employment opportunities;and andbullet; SSA's ability to create and maintain active relationships withdisability organizations, public and private VR/ employment agencies, jobplacement programs, physicians, employers, insurers and others, so thatbeneficiaries can be efficiently referred to organizations which can providethem with employment services.SSA recognizes that in order for the WI provisions and VR/employment opportunitiesto be effective as an integral part of its disability programs, we mustdevelop and field test new and more effective marketing strategies andinformational materials. The information about WIs and VR/employment opportunitiesmust be clearly presented to beneficiaries, advocates, physicians, insurers,employers and others who are involved with beneficiaries, and the informationmust be designed to encourage action on the part of beneficiaries to usethe WIs and take advantage of VR and employment services. These marketingefforts must reach beneficiaries at the earliest time when they are ableto use WIs and VR services. Projects must test the delivery and responseof the WI message at different times (i.e., preaward and post-award). Projectsmust also facilitate linking beneficiaries with appropriate service providers,and provide information about follow-up services for beneficiaries whobecome involved in work activity to assure long-term employment. (Notethat a variety of training and public information materials already exist.Proposals directed at this priority area must specify how existing materialscan be better used or ways in which new materials will be designed thatdiffer and will be more effective.)  SSA's goal is to achieve a comprehensive, integrated communication andservice approach that encourages larger numbers of beneficiaries to workand ultimately gain economic self-sufficiency through productive employment.To accomplish this we seek to include public and private VR providers,national and local VR organizations, advocacy groups, employers and communicationsexperts in tests of innovative and more effective VR and WI communicationapproaches linked to employment services. In general, SSA is seeking projectswhich develop and test effective informational materials about WIs andVR/employment services which lead to inquiry and actions by beneficiariesto return to or initiate employment. Tests of informational materials caninclude training components, however, SSA is not seeking to develop andtest training approaches or programs. Of particular interest are projectsthat: 2.1 <T3>Develop and Test Informational Materials for Professionals and ParaprofessionalsDescribing WIs and VR/Employment Opportunities for Beneficiaries. </T3>Education professionals and other VR and employment service providers whoassist those who are disabled and their families, are a crucial link indisseminating information about SSA's WIs and assessinq VR/employment opportunities.Those who are disabled and their families trust these professionals andlook to them for advice regarding work and its effects on Social Securitydisability benefits. SSA has not easily accessed the large professionaland paraprofessional cadre involved in providing information to beneficiaries.In addition, while SSA has provided information to many professionals,rehabilitation/employment service organizations and disability organizations,there remains a large number of professionals, paraprofessionals and organizationswhich are not clearly informed about WIs and employment opportunities fordisability beneficiaries. The development of appropriately and professionallydesigned informational materials and their widespread distribution is essentialif more beneficiaries are to be provided with clear information and directlyencouraged to access employment services to assist them to return to orinitiate work. It is vital that informational materials be developed and tested with membersof these groups and that networks be established to disseminate these materials:andbullet; By providing such materials to special education teachers, theywould have the information to use when presenting a vocational plan toa disabled child and his/her parents. Further, the educator, student andfamily would then have some basic knowledge about the effect of work onincome and medical benefits provided through SSA's disability programs.With this knowledge they can make informed decisions about the advantagesof work in the disabled child's life and make appropriate decisions aboutVR and employment services. andbullet; Physicians and other medical professionals, in particular, arevaluable allies in transmitting the WI and VR/employment message. Informationalmaterials distributed directly to university staffs could result in developmentof course work on SSA's disability programs, for inclusion in the curriculaof medical students. andbullet; Similar materials could be directed toward the training and developmentof VR counselors.andbullet; SSA is also interested in developing, testing and distributinginformational materials on WIs and VR/ employment opportunities to thelarge variety of other professionals who are involved with disabled personsand their families. And, SSA is interested in materials that can be widelydisseminated to employment programs for the disabled, VR organizations,school departments, employers and insurance firms. The materials that are developed should contain an easy to understand explanationof SSA's disability programs and WI provisions, provide information onopportunities for VR and employment assistance given the beneficiary's potential and solicit the professional's support in encouraging work attempts.In addition, the materials must include specific information about availableVR and employment services and clear instructions as to how such servicescan be obtained. This means that while general information on WIs and VR/employmentopportunities must be included as a part of these projects, materials mustalso include information which is specific to local areas so that the effectivenessof the materials with various target audiences can be evaluated. Proposals in this subpriority area must therefore demonstrate the effectivenessof the informational materials developed. Tests of such materials mustinclude data on the specific response of both organizational, professionaland/or paraprofessional audiences and the response of Social Security disabilitybeneficiaries to the materials themselves and/or the use of the materialsby organizations, professionals and paraprofessionals. Proposals must also clearly specify how the materials can be used nationally,how they can be modified to accommodate local information on availableemployment services, and how they can be easily and cost-effectively adaptedby SSA for national implementation.2.2 <T3>Develop and Test Specialized Informational Materials and CommunicationStrategies to Inform Parents of Disabled Children About WIs and VR Leadingto Competitive Employment. </T3>Many parents of disabled children are unawareof the WI provisions which protect income and medical benefits of disabledchildren who work and of the various VR/ employment programs availableto assist their children obtain competitive work. Since parental supportof work is crucial to the successful entry and maintenance of these childrenin the workforce, SSA must provide understandable and clear informationto parents about WIs and VR/employment opportunities for disabled childrento encourage their willingness to become employed. Proposals in this subpriority area should determine how WI and VR/employmentprogram information can be clearly presented and widely promulgated totwo parental groups. The first consists of parents who have younger childrenin an integrated school setting and where a vocational outcome is expected.The other group consists of parents who have older children who have neverparticipated in an integrated educational environment. In many instancesthe older children are in sheltered workshops and parents and childrenare reluctant to move to competitive work settings. Projects in this subpriority area must demonstrate the effectiveness ofthe informational materials produced in terms of both understanding anduse by parents and return-to-work behavior of disabled children. Proposalswhich merely develop materials and test understanding will not be consideredas responsive. Projects should also obtain the support and involvementof local Developmental Disability Planning Councils and State Protectionand Advocacy Agencies. It is expected that projects in this area will focuson WIs in both the DI and SSI programs, and will also include a test ofinformation about employment services and opportunities available to disabledchildren and the response of parents and children to this information.Similarly to subpriority area 2.1, proposals must demonstrate the effectivenessof the informational materials developed. Tests of such materials mustinclude data on responses of parents and children to the materials themselvesand the use of the materials. Proposals must also clearly specify how thematerials can be used nationally, how they can be modified to accommodatelocal information on available VR/employment services and how they canbe easily and cost-effectively adapted by SSA for national implementation.2.3 <T3>Develop Informational Materials on Available VR/ Employment Servicesand Test the Use of These Materials in SSA Field Offices (FOs) and StateDisability Determination Services to Assist in the Referral of Beneficiariesto VR and Employment Service Providers. </T3>SSA FOs and State DDSs processlarge numbers of applications for DI and SSI benefits. While WIs are describedto applicants for benefits, these descriptions are often not linked withclear information on available VR and employment services and how applicantscan access these services. Since this type of information is essentialif persons who become program beneficiaries are to make full use of availableservices, SSA is interested in proposals that demonstrate the use of genericand locally adaptable informational materials which improve the abilityof SSA and State DDS personnel to link beneficiaries with VR and employmentservices. Projects in this area must be designed to clearly demonstrate how informationalmaterials about local VR and employment services can be used by SSA and/orState DDS personnel to inform applicants and beneficiaries about servicesand encourage them to use these services. SSA is particularly interestedin methods that are highly efficient (including the use of personal computersand software for producing information), adaptable (through including localarea information) throughout the country and that can be clearly evaluatedas to effectiveness in linking applicants and beneficiaries with employmentservices available in local areas.SSA is also seeking projects which increase (through self-training methods)knowledge and understanding by FO and State DDS personnel of availablestate-of-the-art VR/employment approaches for the variety of impaired personswho app1y for or receive disability benefits. SSA is particularly interestedin self-teaching approaches (possibly using personal computers and appropriatesoftware) which could efficiently and effectively provide information onspecialized employment programs such as transitional employment for thedevelopmentally disabled and mentally impaired, programs for persons havingtraumatic physical or neurological injuries and programs for persons havingchronic impairments which often permit employment such as multiple sclerosis,lupus, renal disease, etc.Projects in this area must be designed to develop informational materials,clearly specify the methods for using these materials, test the efficiencyand effectiveness of the materials in SSA FOs and State DDSs, evaluatethe degree to which the information is used by applicants and beneficiariesto locate and access VR/employment services and provide SSA with an evaluationof the replication potential and adaptability of the materials and techniquesfor use on a national basis. This evaluation must also specify how thematerials can be efficiently modified to include information on VR/employmentservices in local areas.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> Projects in this subpriority area must be implemented inconjunction with SSA. For further information about this process, applicantsmay call (301) 965-0105.</ITAG>2.4 <T3>Target Special Disability Beneficiary Populations with Employment Potential.</T3>SSA is interested in projects to develop and test new approaches for informingspecific groups of beneficiaries (e.g., persons with musculoskeletal, cardiac,neurological and mental impairments) about SSA's WI provisions and variousVR/employment strategies that will assist them to obtain work and gaintheir economic independence. The new approaches for disseminating informationshould directly enlist the support of individuals and organizations whocome into direct contact with disability applicants and beneficiaries suchas VR/employment organizations, hospitals (including rehabilitation hospitals),physicians, social service workers, mental health programs and clinics,etc. Projects in this subpriority area should be designed to provide clear informationthat can be used by those who treat and interact with applicants for disabilitybenefits or beneficiaries, to inform them about WIs, significantly increasetheir understanding of WIs and increase their knowledge of and motivationto use appropriate VR/employment services. (Various types of informationmedia can be considered including face-to-face presentations with visualaids, direct marketing kits, flyers, video presentations, etc.) Projectsmust be designed so that the organizations using the information can themselvescontinue to work with applicants and beneficiaries towards achieving employment.Therefore, projects should establish clear employment goals connected withthe development and presentation of information on WIs and VR/employmentopportunities. The information developed, the distribution and communicationmethods to be used and the effects on disability applicants and beneficiariesreceiving the information must be tested and evaluated as a part of theproject. Tests of informational materials must include data on the specificresponses of organizational, professional and paraprofessional audiencesand the response of Social Security disability beneficiaries to the materialsthemselves. In addition, the evaluation must provide SSA with cost effectiveand reliable strategies which could be implemented throughout the country(and modified to provide information about services available in localities)with appropriate organizations having contact with disability applicantsand beneficiaries. <ITAG tagnum="81">Priority Area 3: Employment Projects Targeting Special BeneficiaryPopulations </ITAG>There have been significant advances in the treatment and rehabilitationof persons with certain disabling conditions, such as severe cardiovascularand musculoskeletal disorders, and these treatments have led to restorationof functional capacity and to employment. However, too few disabled beneficiarieshave benefitted from these restorative services and subsequently obtainedassistance in securing employment.Prior demonstrations have shown that the use of specialized rehabilitationand employment programs designed for persons with specific impairmentscan improve the quality and effectiveness of services and increase employmentoutcomes. SSA is interested in demonstrations that include new methodsand techniques to expand rehabilitation and employment opportunities forspecialized beneficiary populations. These projects must emphasize employmentoutcomes and have specific employment goals. They must be designed to assistdisabled beneficiaries to achieve SGA, must be innovative and replicableand must test comprehensive VR/employment interventions which feature thefollowing key components: early or appropriately timed intervention, rapidassessment, coordinated referral and management of VR/employment servicesincluding the use of cost-containment methods. Case management techniquesmay be used but should be highly costeffective and replicable. And, SSAanticipates that projects will include use of multiple sources of existingVR/employment service funding so that SSA funds represent only a portionof the costs of service provision. Projects in this subpriority area mayalso include use of WIs and/or waiver of WI provisions. Further, the proposeddemonstrations must be focused on SSA beneficiary populations and integratedwith the SSA disability program so that key populations are identifiedquickly and efficiently referred to service providers. And, all proposalsmust contain an objective evaluation design which specifically addressesthe issue of project replicability and gives particular attention to measuringthe efficiency, effectiveness and cost-benefit ratio of the techniquesused when integrated with SSA disability program operations. Areas of particular interest include: 3.1 Projects designed to assist persons disabled with spinal cord or otherneurological impairments; 3.2 Projects designed to assist persons disabled due to drug addictionor alcoholism; 3.3 Projects designed to assist persons disabled with mental impairments(including the chronically mentally ill) other than those due to drug addictionor alcoholism who have the potential for employment;3.4 Projects designed to assist persons with developmental disabilitiesto achieve long-term, competitive employment; and 3.5 Projects which target other special populations. <ITAG tagnum="81">Priority Area 4: Employment Strategies for Persons in Transition RequiringServices to Return to Work </ITAG>SSA seeks to demonstrate ways to increase rehabilitation and employmentopportunities for persons in transitional stages of SSA's claims process.Such persons include: current beneficiaries undergoing a continuing disabilityreview (CDR) to determine if their disability has ceased and beneficiariesdetermined to be no longer disabled. (NOTE: Refer to Section I.E.3. forbackground on the current CDR process.) SSA is studying the degree to whichbeneficiaries leave the rolls and later return to beneficiary status. Itis clear that many former beneficiaries (many of whom may be unable toperform their past work, but could perform other work with proper trainingand assistance with job placement) return to the rolls without exploringopportunities for VR and employment services. SSA believes that such personswill be willing to seek employment opportunities <T3>IF </T3>timely and appropriate transitional employment services areoffered. SSA is therefore interested in supporting demonstrations that provide transitionalemployment services to the populations indicated above. Such services mustbe cost-effective and replicable on a national basis. Proposals must presenta systematic method of identifying participants and delivering such services,assuring job placement and monitoring of costs. Proposals must includean objective evaluation design which will measure the efficiency, effectivenessand cost-benefit ratio of the techniques used when integrated with SSA'sdisability program operations. 4.1 <T3>Employment Assistance Programs for Beneficiaries Medically Recoveringfrom Disabling Impairments. </T3>Many beneficiaries whose disability statusis reviewed under the CDR procedure are being contacted by SSA for thefirst time since they were awarded benefits. Information from SSA's demonstrationprojects indicates that once an impairment has stabilized, the beneficiaryis often willing to consider returning to work. Early data suggest thatthe best time for contacting a disabled beneficiary with a chronic butstable conditions is approximately 2 years after award of benefits. Inaddition, during the CDR process, the DDSs gather medical evidence fromboth treating sources and consulting physicians (often specialists), frequentlywith clinical tests to measure the current degree of the beneficiary'simpairment(s), including those which began after entitlement. Thus, inproviding an up-to-date medical evaluation in conjunction with vocationalevaluative information, the CDR process could also provide informationthat could be used to assess a beneficiary's capacity for work. SSA istherefore seeking projects which focus on beneficiaries undergoing a CDRwho demonstrate stabilization of impairment(s) and who can be further evaluatedin terms of vocational potential. Projects must be designed to provideappropriate VR and employment services which will enable beneficiariesto make the transition to competitive employment. And, projects must includeclear methods for: identifying beneficiaries with employment potential;evaluating vocational potential; providing explanations about the demonstrationintervention(s) including the provisions of SSA WIs; providing training,job placement and other necessary transitional employment services; andproviding follow-up services to assure job retention. A waiver of section 301 of Pub. L. 96-265, to permit a continuation ofdisability benefits to beneficiaries who are participating in non-StateVR and employment demonstration programs while services leading to employmentare being provided, will be considered if requested. Waiver of SSI provisionsand other provisions of Pub. L. 96-265, such as the TWP, EPE, etc., willalso be considered if requested. Proposals requesting a waiver must demonstratea clear understanding of the CDR process and section 301 provisions, aswell as any other applicable SSA WIs, and clearly describe how the projectwill be integrated with the current CDR process.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Refer to sections I.E.3. and I.E.4. for further backgroundon the current CDR process and section 301 provisions.</ITAG>4.2 <T3>Rapid Job Placement for Beneficiaries No Longer Disabled.</T3> SSAalso seeks projects which serve those beneficiaries whose disability isdetermined to have ceased based on medical improvement. Projects servingrecent former beneficiaries would provide key assistance to persons whoneed some employment services as they leave the disability rolls. Projectscan also serve beneficiaries who are no longer entitled because of medicalcessation and who may appeal their cessation decision. However, projectsmust seek to achieve successful employment placements for all participantsand provide appropriate services designed to result in competitive employmentfor each project participant. Such services should not be of long-termduration. Projects must be designed to provide appropriate short-term VR and employmentservices which will enable beneficiaries to obtain employment. And, projectsmust include clear methods for: identifying beneficiaries with employmentpotential; evaluating vocational potential; providing explanations aboutthe demonstration interventions; providing training, rapid job placementand other necessary transitional employment services, and providing follow-upservices to assure job retention. A waiver of section 301 of Pub. L. andgreater;96-265, for the purpose ofcontinuing benefits to beneficiaries enrolled in non-State VR and employmentprograms, while services leading to employment are being provided, is available,and will be considered if requested. Proposals requesting a waiver mustdemonstrate a clear understanding of the CDR process and section 301 provisions,as well as any other applicable SSA WIs, and clearly describe how the projectwill be integrated with the current CDR process.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Refer to sections I.E.3. and I.E.4. for further backgroundon the current CDR process and section 301 provisions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Priority Area 5: Payment Models for Vocational Rehabilitation andEmployment Services </ITAG>As SSA develops and tests new VR and employment strategies to assist beneficiariesto obtain employment, it is necessary to assure that its VR resources areused as effectively and efficiently as possible to secure maximum resultsin terms of increased placements into gainful employment and decreaseddependency on the disability benefit rolls in a cost-effective manner.The legislative history of SSA's VR programs clearly indicates that Congresswanted SSA to support VR to the end that the ``maximum numbers'' of beneficiarieswould be ``rehabilitated into productive activity.'' However, Congressalso specified that SSA funds should be used for services that are ``reasonableand necessary;'' that if need be, there should be limits on the ``type,scope, and amount'' of services; and that SSA's VR program expendituresshould generate a net savings for the trust funds/general revenues. Similarly, the recent DAC advised that the goal of SSA's VR programs ``shouldbe to place the maximum number of * * * [beneficiaries] * * * into gainfulemployment so that they will be able to leave the disability rolls * **'' The Council recommended that the effectiveness of SSA's VR programs``be measured by the degree to which such programs increase the capacityof beneficiaries to work or return to work and the degree to which beneficiariesactually achieve substantial gainful employment * * *'' The Council alsoagreed that the expenditure of funds by SSA to finance the rehabilitationof its beneficiaries ``is clearly justified so long as the savings fromcash and medical benefits that would otherwise likely be paid, exceed themoney spent for such services.'' In demonstrating new and more cost-effective VR/employment programs, SSAis seeking to develop cost management strategies which effectively limitthe costs for VR services to those necessary to achieve an employment outcomefor as many beneficiaries as possible. SSA is aware of the fact that beneficiarieswho require services to begin to work or to return to work often differin terms of specific service needs. This means that there will be a mixof cases served by providers and that these cases may require differingamounts of resources. SSA is seeking to test methods which demonstratea clear relationship between the services provided and employment outcomes,accurately measure the costs of services for beneficiaries, include controlsto assure that services provided are needed and are appropriate, and includeperformance criteria that relate employment outcomes to service costs.SSA is seeking to test methods which accurately measure the costs of servicesfor beneficiaries, include controls to assure that services provided areneeded and are appropriate, and include employment outcome measures thatcan be related to service costs using performance criteria. SSA is interested in testing VR payment approaches which broaden the numberand types of beneficiaries served, by improving provider cost managementsystems so that it is cost-effective to serve beneficiaries having differingamounts of service needs and a range of work potential. 5.1 <T3>Examine the Applicability of Private Insurance Rehabilitation and JobPlacement Models to SSA Disability Beneficiaries (Research). </T3>In thelast few years, private disability insurers have begun to focus on disabilityand rehabilitation management methods which include early assessment andmedical management, assessment of costs for rehabilitation and re-employment,the use of fee-for-service rehabilitation providers where cost controlsare a fundamental part of provider services, and the use of performancestandards (return to work outcome) linked to payments for services. Ingeneral, however, there is only limited information available about thesemodels and their effectiveness. SSA wants to know whether and how suchapproaches could be adapted for use with its disability beneficiaries.SSA is interested in research projects that provide information about privateinsurance (or state-of-the-art public sector) VR and employment servicemodels. Projects should investigate the range of services provided, therelationship between services provided and employment outcomes, as wellas the cost/benefit ratio for such services in terms of key measures ofeffectiveness such as medical recovery, vocational outcome and employmentplacement, the types of providers who furnish those services, the experiencesof insurers in regard to the appropriate time to initiate services, theproportion of beneficiaries who receive services, the criteria used toselect clients for services and their reliability, the degree to whichautomated systems are used to screen potential clients for services, thecost of services per client, the cost containment strategies employed,and the VR payment arrangements used. Projects in this subpriority categoryshould be designed to investigate the feasibility of using private insuranceVR/employment models for SSA's disability population. Therefore, in additionto developing information on the concepts, methods, costs and benefitsof recent VR and employment service models, projects should also indicatehow the information developed will be reviewed and evaluated in terms ofuse with the SSA disability program and disability beneficiaries. Suchevaluations must consider issues of feasibility, cost and implementationpotential. 5.2 <T3>Demonstrate Incentive Payment Methods for Vocational Rehabilitation/EmploymentService Providers. </T3>SSA has received recommendations for containingper capita rehabilitation costs and for simplifying reimbursement proceduresto providers of VR/employment services (including both public and privatesector VR/ employment service providers). These include suggestions fora capitation reimbursement approach based on an overall evaluation of therange of expected VR/employment service costs, a flat fee based on somevalidated reasonable cost for services, the use of a fee schedule, providingbonus payments to VR service organizations when services provided resultin employment and termination of disability benefits, the use of multiplesources of VR funding combined with limited SSA funding support, and theelimination of some categories of VR service costs. Some of these approaches arise from the fact that VR costs vary widelydepending on the mix of cases and services provided and because there arenot as yet clear methods for monitoring service quality and cost effectiveness.Others have been suggested to address the fact that SSA now reimbursesproviders for the actual cost of services only and does not provide anyadditional incentive for providers to serve more SSA beneficiaries. Inaddition, there is some question as to whether a performance standard of9 months of SGA is needed in order to assure duration of competitive employmentor whether other possible standards would be as effective and involve simplerprogram administration. (With certain exceptions, this is the performancestandard for which SSA reimburses the State VRAs_see section I.E.5.) SSA has not previously instituted the cost containment recommendationsit has received because of a lack of clear evidence that they will leadto more beneficiaries returning to work while controlling costs and simplifyingprogram administration. Thus, under this subpriority area SSA seeks testsof innovative VR/employment payment and cost containment strategies. Thesetests must involve providers seeking to efficiently control costs whileincreasing employment placements and achieving a high benefit-to-cost ratio.These demonstrations may also involve the testing of new performance criteriato use in place of the current criterion which defines a successful rehabilitationas 9 continuous months of work at or above the SGA level. Possible types of reimbursement and cost containment approaches which couldbe tested include, but are not limited to:andbullet; Prospective Payment Systems One approach to reimbursement and cost containment for SSA's VR programsmight be based on fixed fees for specific services. These could includea single or average fee payment for the achievement of a successful rehabilitation(including employment placement), a fee schedule payment method based ontypes of services provided, or a ``case-mix'' payment method in which servicesand fees are based on an established formula for individuals with relatedimpairments that require similar types of services. Costs under a fixed-fee payment system are contained by setting standardreimbursement rates, and incentives are provided by letting VR providerskeep any differences between the standard rates and their actual costs(capitation type approaches). Proposals using a fixed-fee approach shoulddescribe the method of setting fee rates, how the rate structure will bemaintained and monitored by the provider to control costs, the performancestandard required for  reimbursement, any performance incentives whichare included in the reimbursement approach, and the proposed proceduresfor updating fee rates, while maintaining competition between both publicand private providers. Proposals should also indicate how performance ofproviders will be reviewed in terms of maintaining the rate structure andachieving performance targets of returning disabled beneficiaries to work.Applicants may propose the use of health management cost containment reviewprocedures in their tests. andbullet; Incentive Payment Systems While SSA is concerned with rising VR costs,8 additional program savingsmay be achieved by providing financial incentives to encourage VR providersto place higher priority on providing services to DI and SSI beneficiaries.Accordingly, SSA is interested in testing whether cost-contained expendituresfor incentive payments would be more than compensated for by DI or SSIbenefit savings resulting from increased successful beneficiary employmentplacement efforts by VR providers, induced by the incentives. (Incentivepayment approaches can also be considered with prospective payment methods.)Proposals in this area should specify the incentive approach to be used,e.g., capitation, bonus payment amounts based on exceeding a particularperformance standard, etc. They should also indicate whether incentiveswill be provided for VR firms and agencies or will go directly to VR counselors.Respondents may opt to vary the proportion of both fees and incentive additionspaid to the provider before and after the performance goal is reached,e.g., less than the full fee before the performance goal is reached andan additional percentage after attainment of the goal. Since SSA is seeking to demonstrate that incentive payment systems canbe effective in producing higher numbers of job placements while controllingand monitoring the costs of such placements, proposals in this area must:_Clearly establish placement performance goals (including the goals tobe achieved through the use of the incentive); _Specify the proposed payment structure and rates; and _Describe the methods for monitoring and containing costs. In addition, proposals should present a clear plan for rehabilitating,placing and following-up beneficiaries based on realistic timeframes. It should be noted that Federal regulations governing the use of grantfunds require that funds be used for actual costs incurred and prohibita grantee from earning a profit on the funds provided. Thus, proposalsin this area must be for the management and administration of alternatereimbursement schemes with the grantee providing VR services through othersunder a contractual arrangement. Since other  regulatory restrictions relatingto Federal grant and contract procedures may apply to a specific proposal,a prospective grantee may be requested to modify the proposed reimbursementscheme before a grant is awarded. However, SSA will negotiate these modificationswith the prospective grantee. andbullet; Fee-for-Service Payment System Under the current VR program, SSA reimburses State VRAs for services relatedto a successful rehabilitation and in order to be reimbursed, the servicesmust have been provided while the individual was on the disability rollsand before the individual completed his/her 9th consecutive month of SGA.SSA is concerned that some VR providers may have difficulty serving SSAclients unless they are paid on an individual fee-for-service basis. Thus,SSA is interested in testing this type of payment system. Proposals in this area should focus on testing efficient and cost-effectiveemployment services for beneficiaries who return to work. Proposals should specify the employment performance goals and measurements to be used,the fee structure being tested, the reimbursement procedure, methods tomonitor, manage and control costs for services, and the types of evaluativedata to be collected that will permit analysis of costs for services, serviceefficiency, and effectiveness. It is also important that proposals providedata on the characteristics of those beneficiaries for whom this type ofpayment system is most cost-effective. All proposals submitted under this subpriority area must demonstrate aclear relationship between services provided and employment outcomes andindicate the methods and measures which would be used to evaluate the outcomeand processes of the demonstration. Outcome measures should focus on thenumber of beneficiaries referred for VR services, the number evaluatedfor VR services, the number accepted for services, the number completingservices both returning to work and not returning to work, and the jobretention rates for persons who become employed. Also, the characteristics(age, sex, education, etc.) of beneficiaries at each stage in the VR programshould be indicated. In addition, the process measures should focus onthe organizational structure for the VR entity involved,  administrativeprocedures and costs associated with the administration of the programtested, the degree of intercomponent coordination, the specific roles ofeach component involved, and some assessment of how the demonstrated programwould work if it were adopted by SSA on an ongoing basis. All proposalsmust provide data on the costs of specific services provided to beneficiaries,the range of service costs for different beneficiaries (or groups) withdiffering service needs, the <T3>effectiveness</T3> of cost management techniques and the overall cost/effectivenessof services provided based on employment outcomes obtained. 5.3 <T3>Systems to Measure the Cost-Effectiveness of VR/Employment Services.</T3>It is important that SSA be able to accurately and efficiently monitorand report on the effectiveness of VR/employment programs. Therefore, SSAis interested in projects that develop and test practical management systemsto monitor and assess costs and outcomes of VR/employment services. Projects in this subpriority area should focus on developing computer managementinformation systems designed to monitor the relationship of VR/employmentservices and outcomes based on specified performance criteria. In addition,the systems that are designed and tested should provide management reportspermitting ongoing measurement of cost-effectiveness in terms of the numberof beneficiaries referred for VR services, the number to be evaluated forVR services, the number accepted for services, the number completing servicesboth returning to work and not returning to work, the costs and types ofservices provided, job retention rates for persons who become employed,and the characteristics (age, sex, education, etc.) of beneficiaries ateach stage in the VR program. An overall cost/effectiveness measurementcriterion should be included in such projects or several criteria can betested and evaluated. In addition, such systems could also test the useof management information to evaluate cost/effectiveness of service provisionfor different case-mix groups involving differing amounts of services.It is anticipated that such systems should be able to operate using personalcomputers and appropriate software. Projects in this area may involve a performance measurement criterion thatis different from the current law definition of success, i.e., 9 monthsof continuous work at or above the SGA monthly earnings level. If an alternativemeasure of success is used, the project should test the ability of thismeasure to accurately predict long-term employment and eventual terminationfrom the DI and SSI rolls. Projects that involve new measurements of successshould be relatively simple to administer, not require burdensome reportingrequirements for VR providers, be feasible for both public and privateVRAs, and include a method of obtaining accurate and timely informationabout placement success. In addition, such proposals should include a meansof comparing the proposed performance measure with the current performancecriteria. Projects in this subpriority area must include <T3>both </T3>the development of management information system(s) and thedemonstration of how such system(s) can be used for  providing informationon outcomes of VR/employment services for SSA beneficiaries. Also, SSArequires that the system(s) developed be completely documented, fully testedand independently evaluated using empirical data on disability beneficiaries.<ITAG tagnum="81">Priority Area 6: Use of Employment Provider Networks for ManagingReturn to Work Programs </ITAG>SSA recognizes that in most local areas throughout the country there aremultiple providers of VR and employment services and that beneficiariescould be served by these providers. SSA is also aware that many public sector VR organizations, including StateVRAs, Developmental Disabilities Councils, State Education Departments,etc., often have VR and employment service provision arrangements withnon-public sector providers including Projects with Industry programs,Job Training Partnership Act project sponsors, non-profit VR organizations,rehabilitation hospitals, employer training centers, etc. SSA is interestedin tests which would use these networks (or enhanced networks) to effectivelyserve beneficiaries while controlling service costs and introducing efficiencywithin the referral-evaluation-service-employment-process. SSA is interested in testing whether coordinated or consortium type arrangements(i.e., multiple private sector providers or public and private sector providersin collaboration) could be implemented which would link qroups of providerstogether as a resource for referring beneficiaries for services. SSA believesthat such consortia or cooperative provider groups could efficiently andcost-effectively serve beneficiaries. In addition, such groups could providea single point of contact for SSA in referring beneficiaries and providinginformation on WI policies. Provider groups could be organized and managedby public or private sector VR/employment organizations. However, suchgroups would have to be linked by an ongoing, effective referral and serviceprovision network where service provision and outcomes could be monitoredand costs of services could be managed.Projects in this overall priority area must be designed so that SSA canevaluate the potential of similar VR provider networks to serve beneficiarieson a national basis. This requires that procedures used to establish, administer,and manage such networks be carefully designed and documented includingreports of needed modifications to increase the efficiency and effectivenessof such networks. In addition, SSA is primarily interested in accessingsuch networks so that many more beneficiaries can receive necessary employmentservices and be enabled to return to work or begin competitive employment.It is therefore essential that these demonstrations include clear ongoinglinkages to SSA FOs and State DDSs which can refer beneficiaries and provideinformation on use of WIs for enhancing employment outcomes. And, the demonstrationsmust be sufficiently comprehensive to provide data indicating the outcomeof services provided to beneficiaries using the network, including detailedinformation on the costs of services in terms of the employment outcomesachieved. In general, therefore, SSA will require comprehensive evaluationsof these projects which focus on the feasibility of establishing servicenetworks, their efficiency and cost-effectiveness, their ease of administration,the facility of linkages to SSA FOs and State DDSs, and the overall effectivenessof these networks in assisting beneficiaries to return to employment. 6.1 <T3>Networks of VR/Employment Providers. </T3>SSA is interested in testswhich demonstrate the potential for multiple VR/employment service providersin the public or private sector to form groups or act as a consortium forthe purpose of providing services to beneficiaries. Such groups would haveto involve sufficient providers in a particular geographical area so thatSSA could continuously refer beneficiaries to the group and be assuredthat they would be evaluated and services provided to them efficiently.In addition, a single point of contact would be needed for each providergroup so that SSA could refer beneficiaries rapidly and efficiently. Such demonstrations would have to involve: establishment of the providergroup; a detailed plan of the administrative and management methods tobe used; specific client workload projections based on SSA referrals; aclear description of how SSA clients will be evaluated, referred and served;specification of employment outcome performance measures and how thesewill be monitored; a description of how fees for services will be handled,the cost controls and cost monitoring procedures that will be used by thegroup, and the methods and techniques that will be used to evaluate theeffectiveness and efficiency of the group or consortium. Project descriptionsmust clearly identify how groups or consortia will be formed and how theywill be able to manage service provision to SSA beneficiaries on a continuousbasis while monitoring and controlling service costs and assuring employmentplacement outcomes for beneficiaries. Applicants must also provide a planto evaluate the effectiveness and efficacy of each provider network demonstration.6.2 <T3>Develop and Test a Comprehensive Communication System to Link SSA DistrictOffices and VR/Employment Providers. </T3>SSA seeks projects that willimprove the communication and information exchange between SSA FOs andthe providers of VR/employment services. This exchange is necessary inorder to more effectively inform applicants and beneficiaries with returnto work potential about WIs and available VR/employment services to clearlylink them with networks of service providers and employers who can assistthem with job placement. All projects in this subpriority area must demonstrate a system that directlylinks applicants for disability benefits or beneficiaries with networksof VR and employment services providers. Projects must include detaileddocumentation of the particular methods used (in-person, telephone, computer-generatedreferral, etc.), informational materials developed and used, the specificresponsibilities of SSA FO personnel and of VR/employment organizationpersonnel and must be designed and evaluated in terms of their potentialfor replication on a national basis. Projects must specifically test andevaluate the effectiveness of linkages between SSA FO personnel and VR/employmentproviders by disability applicants and beneficiaries (including deliveryof the WI message). Projects must be highly cost-effective, replicable, and involve appropriateevaluation and measurement techniques to assure that the demonstrationseffectively increase beneficiary knowledge of WIs, affect beneficiary behaviorand measurably improve linkages between SSA, beneficiaries and VR/employmentservice providers. <ITAG tagnum="81">Priority Area 7: Employment and Training Demonstrations </ITAG>SSA is particularly concerned that persons with disabilities have everyopportunity to continue or return to productive employment. The DAC stronglyrecommended that the disability programs encourage employment for bothcurrent beneficiaries and potential future beneficiaries by providing moredirect and effective linkages to rehabilitation and employment services.The Council further suggested that consideration be given to modifyingWI policies to further encourage beneficiary attempts to work. The Councilrecommended that SSA test new approaches to accomplish these objectivesby using the demonstration grant authorities in the RDP.Recommendations have also been made that SSA test additional WI approachesfor disabled beneficiaries who require training (often at an employer'slocation) so that they can successfully return to employment. It has beensuggested that frequently beneficiaries have used up part or all of theirTWP through prior work attempts and that further training is consideredas work by SSA, leading to suspension of disability benefits after useof a few remaining TWP months or immediately, if all TWP months have beenused. VR and employment service providers suggest that many beneficiarieswho may have used all or most of their TWP earlier, can successfully returnto work if provided with a period of training (including on-the-job trainingat an employer's location) during which disability benefits continue througha specified training period when wages are received by the beneficiary.Therefore, tests have been suggested which would permit beneficiaries havingfew or no TWP months to participate in job training and placement programsof specified duration while disability benefits continue, as an incentivefor their returning to work. SSA is interested in providing effective VR/employment services and WIsso that the impaired and disabled can return to employment whenever possibleand at the earliest possible time consistent with their capabilities andpotential. Therefore, SSA is seeking tests of VR/employment programs havingclear job placement goals where disability claimants and beneficiariescan pursue rehabilitation and employment programs at the earliest possibletime and can (where necessary) receive the training needed to secure andretain employment. 7.1 <T3>Employment and Training Programs for Disability Beneficiaries. </T3>SSAseeks tests where disability beneficiaries or recipients of SSI paymentsrequire periods of training including on-the-job training at the employer'slocation, in order to obtain and continue their employment. For example,demonstrations may focus on DI beneficiaries who have used most or allof their TWP months previously although beneficiaries having full TWP monthsavailable may also be included as participants. Projects should focus onproviding job training that results in placement into employment. Otherrehabilitation and employment services may be provided as needed to achievean employment goal. And, components such as case-management, beneficiaryinvolvement in services planning and delivery and employment follow-upservices are also encouraged. SSA anticipates that these projects can beconducted by public and private service providers having ongoing trainingand job placement programs which can be adapted for disability beneficiaries.These programs and their adaptation for beneficiaries must be clearly describedand the emphasis of the proposed program must be on job placement for beneficiaries.Disability and SSI eligibility rules (e.g., DI and SSI definition of ``medicalimprovement,'' SSI income and resource rules, etc.) do not change for projectparticipants unless appropriate waivers are obtained. SSA will considerproviding waivers of certain provisions of the Act for these demonstrations.Such waivers could involve, for example, disregarding application of theTWP for relatively short periods of training (up to 6 consecutive months);establishing a special training period of limited duration where the TWPis no longer available, but where benefit payments will continue duringthe training period and for a short period when full job placement hasoccurred; establishing a special training program of limited duration priorto initiation of the TWP; establishing a special training program for SSIprogram recipients where the countable income provisions are modified fora limited period of time while training and job placement takes place;etc. These demonstrations must be designed to provide detailed information onthe characteristics of the beneficiaries participating and their employmenthistories. All demonstrations must include in their design the followingcomponents: (a) Continuous monitoring of services provided to participantsand use of services; (b) costs of each service component; (c) durationof services; (d) extent, duration and cost of placement services; (e) detailedinformation on employment placements including occupational categories,types of employers, training provided at the employer's location, wages,duration of employment and reason for not continuing employment. In addition,the training services provided by the organization and at the employer'slocations must be clearly described and their costs documented. The durationof services and the relationship of training to job placement and job retentionmust also be clearly described with service costs provided. Also, the extentof use of any waivers involved in the project and their relationship tojob placement outcome must be documented and described. Finally, it isvery important for these demonstrations to be documented in terms of theirreplication potential within the various sponsoring organizations, thelikely outcomes in terms of the ongoing costs and waivers that would beneeded for such replication on a regular basis. Proposals must indicatehow such documentation and analysis will be provided.<ITAG tagnum="81">Priority Area 8: State Vocational Rehabilitation Program Demonstrations</ITAG>State VRA demonstrations funded under the RDP have indicated a number ofpromising directions that could enhance and improve the employment servicesprovided to SSA beneficiaries by State VRAs. Thus far, the results of projectsinvolving case management for beneficiaries, cooperative public/privateprovider service provision and specialized service provision for SSA beneficiariesusing fee-for-service arrangements appear promising. SSA is interestedin testing additional innovative State VRA demonstrations emphasizing successfuljob placement for beneficiaries. These demonstrations may address the subpriorityareas identified below which have been suggested by a number of VRAs. Inaddition, States may develop innovative demonstration project recommendationsthat extend beyond the suggested subpriorities. However, the demonstrationsproposed must be designed so that they could be replicated on a nationalbasis and provide similar results assuming similar procedures and beneficiarypopulations would be involved. And, projects must emphasize efficient clientevaluation, service provision and employment outcomes while also usingeffective cost control mechanisms. 8.1 <T3>Projects Using Placement Methods Similar to Those Used for PersonsReceiving State Worker's Compensation Benefits. </T3>These projects mayuse fee-for-service or other forms of reimbursement and must involve disabilitybeneficiaries. Use of specialized employment placement units within Stateagencies is feasible so long as these approaches lead to measurable andsignificant increases in employment for beneficiaries. 8.2 <T3>Collaborative Employment Projects with Private/Non-Profit VR Providers.</T3>These projects should involve provision of employment services tobeneficiaries through cooperative arrangements between State VRAs and otherservice providers. (Consortium arrangements can be made.) SSA is particularlyinterested in projects which involve already established cooperative arrangementswhich would be effective with SSA beneficiaries. The replication potentialof such projects is particularly important and therefore models which couldbe widely implemented are being sought. 8.3 <T3>Projects Providing Continued Services to Assist Beneficiaries in MaintainingEmployment. </T3>SSA's RDP has shown that beneficiaries having many differentimpairments can be successfully placed in competitive employment. But,it appears that some who are successfully employed work for relativelyshort periods of time, often less than one year. While the reasons forthis pattern are not well understood, it is clear that for some employedbeneficiaries, continued employment support may significantly increaseretention of jobs over longer periods of time. This may be particularlytrue for certain impaired populations such as the chronically mentallyill, the developmentally disabled, persons having strokes, the traumaticallybrain injured, etc.SSA is interested in tests potentially demonstrating the effectivenessof continued employment support services (where needed) in assisting beneficiariesto retain their employment over measurable periods of time particularlyexceeding 12 months. Such projects can involve a variety of evaluationand job placement methods but must at a minimum: (1) Focus on SSA beneficiarieswho are placed into employment; (2) include an efficient assessment oftheir need for continued employment support services; (3) provide cleardemonstration of the services provided, their costs and the characteristicsof beneficiaries receiving services; (4) provide clear documentation ofservice outcomes in terms of job retention by beneficiaries preferablyas compared to a similar beneficiary group placed into employment but notreceiving employment support services; (5) provide a concise explanationof the methods for case evaluation, service provision, cost managementand measuring service outcomes; and (6) provide a description of how suchservices could be added to an existing VR/employment program, targetedon beneficiaries needing the services and provided cost-effectively. Replicationpotential must also be clearly established in these projects. 8.4 <T3>Projects Using Specified Incentives to Improve Placement Outcomes.</T3>Some State VRAs have introduced incentive and bonus programs for VRcounselors to enhance achievement of placement goals. Others have developedspecialized fee-for-service placement programs sometimes involving incentives,to increase job placement rates. And in some States, specialized effortshave been made to link State VR programs with VR service organizationssuch as Projects with Industry programs, rehabilitation hospitals, rehabilitationfacilities, etc. SSA is interested in tests which involve specialized incentivesdesigned to increase placements of beneficiaries into employment. Thesedemonstrations must be designed so that the effectiveness of the particularincentive(s) being tested can be clearly evaluated in comparison to circumstanceswhere incentives are not used. And, the costs of incentives and the benefits(increased employment of beneficiaries) must be carefully specified topermit an assessment of cost-effectiveness. In developing these tests,SSA is primarily interested in how using incentives can significantly increaseemployment placements for beneficiaries and in the replication potentialof the incentive approaches. Incentive approaches can be focused on staffproviding VR/employment services, on the VR agency and/or on services beingprovided by the VRA in collaboration with other VR providers. And, in designingincentive programs, care should be taken to clearly specify both the baselineand incentive level performance criteria (job placements, retention, etc.)that will be used and how the project will be evaluated in terms of theproposed performance criteria. SSA is seeking to test new and innovativeincentive methods in this subpriority area. Proposals which repeat testsof incentives already being used are not being sought. 8.5 <T3>Projects Providing Medical and Vocational Services Leading to Employment.</T3>RDP demonstrations have indicated that some beneficiaries requiremedical services as well as vocational services in order to successfullyreturn to employment. SSA is interested in demonstrations that would testefficient methods for identifying beneficiaries requiring a combinationof medical and vocational services, provide these services using alreadyavailable resources to cover medical and vocational costs (where feasible)and provide job placement services and needed post-placement job supportservices. These demonstrations should be designed to effectively identifyand serve beneficiaries who will in most instances return to work. Therefore,SSA is interested in the criteria used to identify suitable beneficiariesfor a multiple service intervention strategy as well as identifying thetypes of services required, their costs and the ultimate employment outcomesresulting from service provision. SSA anticipates that these demonstrationsmay involve collaboration between VRAs and medical service providers andthat case management methods may be used in these projects. Also, demonstrationslinking services available through programs of the Department of Education,Rehabilitation Services Administration (RSA) with those specialized servicesrequired for beneficiaries with both medical and vocational service needs,is of interest to SSA. In such tests, it would be important to carefullydescribe services available through RSA and those specialized additionalservices required in order to achieve employment for beneficiaries in termsof service content, cost and outcomes achieved. 8.6 <T3>Other Innovative Employment Demonstrations. </T3>Projects emphasizingemployment for beneficiaries which demonstrate replicable, cost-effectiveinnovations for achieving increasing numbers of placements are encouragedin this subpriority area. Projects may focus on referral, evaluation, serviceprovision and/or employment outcome. However, projects which integrateservices and demonstrate efficiency in achieving placements while controllingcosts through specified cost management techniques are preferred.<ITAG tagnum="81">Priority Area 9: Non-Designated Projects (Research or Demonstration)</ITAG>Applicants may also submit applications for funding in areas not specificallyidentified in this announcement but which are relevant to the goals andobjectives of the disability program. These applications will be termed``non-designated'' but will be competitively evaluated by independent reviewerswith other ``non-designated'' applications. A limited number of projectsmay be funded depending upon available funds. <ITAG tagnum="84">Section III_Application Process </ITAG>A. Eligible Applicants Any State or local government and public or private organization or agencymay apply for a grant under this announcement. (Individuals are not eligibleto apply.) For-profit organizations may apply with the understanding thatno grant funds may be paid as profit to any grant recipient. Profit isconsidered as any amount in excess of the allowable costs of the grantrecipient. A for-profit organization means a corporation or other legalentity which is organized or operated for the profit or benefit of itsshareholders or other owners and must be distinguishable or legally separablefrom that of an individual acting on his/her own behalf. B. Availability and Duration of Funding Federal grant funds may be requested for reimbursement of allowable costsincurred by applicants in conducting the demonstration. These funds, however,are not intended to cover costs that are reimbursable under an existingpublic or private program. SSA generally expects, under this announcement,to fund the initial 12-month budget period of demonstrations designed tobe completed in 12 to 24 months. Awards for the continuation of selectedprojects will be based on acceptable performance, availability of funds,and assessment of the continuing relevance of the demonstration or researcheffort. In general, we anticipate funding projects that cost a total ofbetween $100,000 and $200,000 per year. Actual awards may vary and eligibleapplicants may request smaller or larger awards. C. Grantee Share of the Project Costs Grant recipients are required to contribute towards the cost of each project.SSA does not make grant awards for the total cost of the projects. Grantrecipient's contributions may be cash or in-kind (property or services)or third party cash or in-kind contributions. Successful applicants fordemonstration grants are eligible to receive 3 dollars in Federal fundingfor each l dollar secured from non-Federal sources, up to the limits specifiedin the priority area descriptions in this announcement. Therefore, at least25 percent of the total costs for demonstration projects must come froma source other than the Federal government. However, for applicants submitting research proposals, a 5-percent minimummatch is required. ``Research'' is defined as ``a systematic investigationdesigned to develop or contribute to generalizable knowledge.'' Proposalswhich meet this definition will constitute ``research'' for the purposeof determining the minimum match percentage requirement. D. Availability of Forms All instructions and forms required for submittal of applications are includedin this announcement. Additional copies of this announcement may be obtainedby writing or telephoning Grants Management Staff, Division of Contractand Grant Operations, OAG, DCM; Social Security Administration; 1-E-4 GwynnOak Building; 1710 Gwynn Oak Avenue; Baltimore, Maryland 21207; Attention:SSA RDP-3; Telephone: (301) 965-9500. E. Application Submission An original and a minimum of two signed copies of the application materialmust be submitted to the above address. Submittal of six additional copiesis optional and will expedite processing. However, there is no penaltyfor not submitting the additional copies.F. Application Consideration All applications requesting Federal grant funds must be submitted on thestandard forms provided in this announcement. The application shall beexecuted by an individual authorized to act for the applicant organizationand to assume for the applicant organization the obligations imposed bythe terms and conditions of a grant award. Applications that conform to the requirements of this program announcementwill be reviewed and scored by independent reviewers against the evaluationcriteria specified in Section III, H.2. of this announcement. Althoughthe results of this review are a primary factor considered in making thedecision about an application, review scores are not the only factor. SSA reserves the option of discussing applications with, or referring themto, other Federal or non-Federal funding sources when it is determinedto be in the best interest of the Federal government or the applicant.G. Special Considerations for Funding Within the limits of available Federal funds, SSA will make financial assistanceawards consistent with the statutory authorities governing the SSA RDPand this announcement. In making these decisions, preference may be givento applications which feature: a substantial innovation that has the potentialto improve practice in the VR/employment of persons on SSA's disabilityrolls; a model practice or set of procedures that hold the potential fordissemination to, and utilization by organizations involved in the administrationor delivery of rehabilitation services; and, substantial involvement (eitherfinancial or programmatic) of the private sector and the possibility ofa large degree of benefit for a small Federal investment. Also, SSA willtake into account the need to avoid duplication of effort in making fundingdecisions. H. Criteria for Screening and Review All applications that meet the deadline will be screened to determine completenessand conformity to the requirements of this announcement. Complete, conformingapplications will then be reviewed and evaluated. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Screening Requirements </ITAG>In order for an application to be in conformance, it must meet all of thefollowing requirements: (a) <T3>Number of copies:</T3> An original and two signed copies of the applicationmaterial must be submitted. Six additional copies are optional but willexpedite processing. (b) <T3>Length:</T3> The program narrative portion of the application MUSTNOT EXCEED 25 DOUBLE-SPACED PAGES (or 13 single-spaced pages) typewrittenon one side of the paper only. (c) <T3>Selection of priority area:</T3> In item 11 of the Face Sheet (SF-424),indicate one subpriority area only for which the application is being submitted,(e.g., 4.1, 7.1, 8.1, etc.). If not submitted in response to any of thesubpriority areas specified by this announcement, indicate ``non-designated.''<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Evaluation Criteria </ITAG>Applications which pass the screening will be reviewed by at least threeindividuals. Reviewers will score the applications, basing their scoringdecisions on the criteria listed below. (a) <T3>Project Objectives: 5 points. </T3>The application details the specificobjectives/hypotheses of the project. How closely do the project's objectives/hypothesesfit the objectives of the subpriority area under which the applicationis submitted? For non-designated (Priority Area 9) projects, how well dothe objectives of the project fit the general goals and objectives of theannouncement? (b) <T3>Background/Importance of Project: 10 points. </T3>The application clearlydescribes the problem, issue or situation that prompts the applicant'sproposal. The need for the activity is discussed in terms of local, regionalor national significance and the importance of the issues to be addressed.It also summarizes the state-of-the-art in addressing and designing methodsor strategies to resolve the problems or issues identified, including previousefforts and how this project builds upon such previous efforts, how itadvances the state of knowledge from a national perspective, and how itaddresses a priority need identified in this announcement (or in the caseof a ``non-designated'' project, how it addresses the general goals andobjectives of this announcement). Where appropriate, attention is paidto the larger significance (regional, national) of the project, beyondits actual implementation site(s). (c) <T3>Project Design: 25 points. </T3>1. List the concepts to be tested and/or.evaluated in the project. Make them clearly relate to the objectives ofthe priority area(s) chosen. For example, if the priority area requiresthat the project be designed to return disability beneficiaries to SGA,the basic concept should be that the procedure you are testing and demonstratingwill return more beneficiaries to SGA. 2. Describe how you plan to conduct your demonstration or research project.Provide a detailed description of the methods and procedures you plan touse and indicate how you plan to measure the effects of your test(s) relativeto some benchmark, e.g., how many more of your participants achieve SGAas compared with your estimate of the number you would expect under thecurrent SSA disability programs. It is essential that the methods and proceduresyou specify be clearly related to the concept(s) being tested and/or demonstratedand that the methods provide measurable data and information on projectresults. 3. Indicate the size of your sample and describe how you arrived at yoursample size in light of the hypotheses to be tested. Include an explanationof how control and comparison groups will be formed, the intended numberof subjects and how group size will be determined. Explain how the samplesize will be sufficient to detect differences between the treatment andcontrol group in which you are interested, e.g., indicate the statisticalpower of the test. For example, a demonstration with chronic brain damagedbeneficiaries in a medium-size metropolitan area may be difficult, giventhe small numbers of such beneficiaries who may reside within that area.Your proposal should give assurances that you have determined that a sufficientnumber of subjects reside in the geographic area of the demonstration siteto permit an adequate sample size. In projects that are not designed sothat statistical tests are appropriate, provide a clear explanation ofhow the methodology will permit conclusions to be reached as to the generalsignificance of the results in comparison with a benchmark measure establishedprior to the demonstration test.4. Explain how you propose to select your sample. Describe the processof acquiring eligible subjects. Describe any incentives used to encouragesubjects to participate and ensure continued cooperation. If subjects areto be obtained with the assistance of SSA or State agencies (such as throughSSA DOs, DDSs or State VRAs), describe how this process will occur andwherever possible submit evidence of consultation with these organizations.5. It is probable that an observation period which is longer than the treatmentperiod will be required for your efforts. Discuss the length of the treatmentand observation periods and describe how the length of your observationperiod will be sufficient to gather the necessary data. Describe how contactwill be made for gathering data during the observation period, e.g., mailcontact, phone contact, personal contact, employer follow-up, etc. <T4>Note: </T4>In some instances, primarily with larger demonstrations,it may be possible to construct a statistically valid experimental design.In those instances, a full project protocol should be provided, includinga statement of hypotheses to be tested, a detailed explanation of the methodologyto be used (nature of statistical tests and methods, etc.), a descriptionof the sample design and explanation of how the sample design is suitedto the statistical methodology and hypotheses to be tested, rationale forspecification of sample size, and an estimate with explanation of the statisticalpower of the tests to be used in the research design. In such designs,the use of an appropriate, randomly-selected control group is highly desirable.6. List the data and information to be collected in the demonstration orresearch project. Discuss how the data and information will be used inthe analysis of results. Discuss the data and information that will besupplied for further evaluation by SSA and describe plans to provide SSAwith project data on both the treatment (and control group where appropriate),on an ongoing basis, so that SSA may continue an evaluation after thatperformed by the grantee. It is recommended that the data for each participantinclude, but need not be limited to, the following: a. Education b. Date of birth c. Prior occupation d. Sex e. Type of disability f. The following dates: andbullet; Start of treatment andbullet; Start of each job and type of job andbullet; End of each job  andbullet; Date of completion of TWP andbullet; Date of termination of SSDI and/or SSI benefits andbullet; Death andbullet; Withdrawal or termination from study g. Income from all sources (e.g., other disability income, monthly earningson jobs, spousal earnings). h. Cost of each treatment provided (SSA will provide grantees with a standardmeans to allocate the costs so that data from grantees will be comparable.)Grantees must use this method. 7. Discuss potential problems that may arise in conducting the demonstrationor research project and suggest how they may be resolved, e.g., describehow dropouts, inadequate number of referrals, etc., will be handled. (d) <T3>Project Evaluation: 20 Points. </T3>The proposed evaluation plan shouldinclude a description of the method for documenting what was done underthis project (the process) as well as the outcome achieved from the projectactivities. For the process evaluation, you need to indicate the informationto be collected, the frequency of collection, the method of collectionand recording, and the use of this information. For the outcome evaluation,you must say how you will determine if the project is successful, and howthe information will be collected and analyzed.The evaluation plan should describe the criteria for determining (measuring)the success and effectiveness of the project. The evaluation plan shouldspecifically describe: how the data to be collected (as described in theproject design section) will be used to evaluate the project, the specifictypes of analysis to be performed and who will be responsible for conductingthe evaluation. Projects which are not designed to test specific hypotheses,procedures, or systems, should specify the information or types of recommendationsto be produced, describe how the information will be evaluated and describehow the programmatic or administrative advantages (benefits) and resourcerequirements (costs) involved will be documented. The evaluation plan shouldalso describe how data and information collected will be used to provideSSA with information on the costs of the demonstration test, the potentialsavings in disability benefits that would accrue and any administrativeefficiencies of the demonstration that would be of benefit to SSA. In developing your evaluation plan, the following should be addressed inyour proposal: andbullet; Plans to provide information to enable SSA to follow project participantsfor a period sufficient to observe whether work attempts are sustainedand terminations from the DI and/or SSI program result; and andbullet; For projects designed to provide SSA with data and information,or involving a test of a particular system, methodology or measurementscale, the evaluation plan should specify how the particular products beingdeveloped in the project will be reviewed and provide a sufficient explanationof the methods for evaluating products to assure that they will be thoroughlyevaluated. Greater consideration will be given to proposals which meet the followingcriterion:andbullet; Where the size and scope of the proposed demonstration requireand the project includes a statistically valid experimental design andthe establishment of a control group of individuals with similar characteristicsto the participants receiving the treatment (SSA prefers that the projectparticipants be identified prior to start of the treatment so that theparticipants may be randomly assigned between the treatment and controlgroups); (e) <T3>Work Plan: 15 points. </T3>The application provides specific plansfor conducting the project clearly identifying the tasks to be performed.It includes relevant information about: (1) The tasks to be completed inthe project, (2) a chart with tasks laid out over time (Gantt chart), (3)a clear description of how much time and how many and which staff willbe needed to complete each task, (4) the products and reports of findingsto be developed over the course of the project, and (5) if an independentcontractor is to be used for any part of the project, include the scopeof work to be performed by such contractor, the tasks to be completed,a time chart for such tasks, and the products to be provided by the subcontractor.The workplan clearly indicates all the tasks to be accomplished in theproject, their timing and highlights, the key phases of the project, andthe major products to be produced including reports of project results.(f) <T3>Organizational Capability: 10 points. </T3>The resources that willbe needed to conduct the project are specified including personnel, time,funds and facilities (including computer capability, and specialized technicalequipment, where relevant). These resources should be adequate to accomplishthe workplan described in the application. The staff (or other personnelresources) should be qualified and possess the variety of skills and abilitiesrequired to produce final results that are readily comprehensible and usable.The qualifications of top staff who would have little or no direct impacton the project would not be relevant. The staffing pattern clearly linksresponsibilities to project tasks. Any collaborative effort with otheragencies or organizations is clearly identified, and written assurancesreferenced. The total cost of the project is reasonable in view of theanticipated results. A description by category (personnel, travel, etc.)of total Federal funds required is included. The funds (total of Federalfunds and non-Federal funds) are specified. The amount of Federal fundsrequested in each budget category is explained and justified in terms ofthe specific purposes for which the funds are to be used. The locationand adequacy of the facilities are provided. (g) <T3>Implementation Potential: 10 points. </T3>The application addressesthe benefits that might be achieved through replication of the projectresults and the costs that such replication would require. Discussion isincluded of special features of the target group(s) for which the proposalis designed, how final products will facilitate use of project findings,and a description of plans to continue the project or implement its findingsafter completion. Where feasible, the application discusses the potentialsignificance of the project for wider scale implementation on a nationalbasis. (h) <T3>Dissemination of Results: 5 points. </T3>The proposed project specifiesthe means to be used to disseminate results and promote use of resultsby other organizations in appropriate fields. Wherever possible, the applicationshould document specific methods to communicate project results includingpreparation of project reports and descriptive materials and their disseminationto appropriate audiences. These evaluation criteria correspond to the outline for the narrative sectionof the application. The descriptions of the eight criteria above shouldbe used in developing the program narrative. Also refer to the outlinein section III of the application form SSA-96-BK.I. Closing Date for Receipt of Applications The closing date for submittal of applications under this announcementis June 5, 1989. Applications must be mailed or hand-delivered to: GrantsManagement Staff, Division of Contract and Grant Operations, OAG, DCM,Social Security Administration, 1-E-4 Gwynn Oak Building, 1710 Gwynn OakAvenue, Baltimore, Maryland 21207 Attention: SSA RDP-3, Subpriority  Area:<T2>XXX</T2> Hand-delivered applications are accepted during the hours of 8:00 a.m.to 5:00 p.m., Monday through Friday. An application will be consideredas meeting the deadline if it is either: 1. Received on or before the deadline date at the above address; or 2. Mailed through the United States Postal Service or sent by commercialcarrier on or before the deadline date and received prior to the scheduledmeeting of the reviewers selected to evaluate the grant applications. Applicantsare cautioned to request a legibly dated U.S. Postal Service postmark orto obtain a legibly dated receipt from a commercial carrier as evidenceof timely mailing. Private metered postmarks are not acceptable as proofof timely mailing. Applications which do not meet the above criteria are considered late applications.SSA will notify each late applicant that its application will not be consideredin the current competition. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paperwork Reduction Act  </ITAG>This notice contains reporting requirements in ``The Application Process''section. However, the information is collected using Form SSA-96, FederalAssistance, which has OMB clearance number 0960-0184. <ITAG tagnum="81">Executive Order 12372_Intergovernmental Review of Federal Programs</ITAG>This program is not covered by the requirements of Executive Order 12372relating to the Federal policy for consulting with State and local electedofficials on proposed Federal financial assistance.<ITAG tagnum="21">Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Program (CFDA) No. 13.812_AssistancePayments_Research and Demonstrations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: March 29, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">David A. Rust, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Associate Commissioner for Disability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Rhoda M.G. Davis, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Associate Commissioner for Supplemental Security Income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Louis D. Enoff, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Deputy Commissioner for Programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Dorcas R. Hardy,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Social Security.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Section IV Instructions for Completing Applications </ITAG>A. Application Package In order to expedite the processing of applications, we request that youadhere to the following instructions explicitly. An application may beconsidered incomplete and returned if it fails to follow the instructionsor if the material presented is insufficient to permit an adequate review.andbullet; Type the application using standard-size type. andbullet; Type on one side only. andbullet; Reproduced copies should be single-sided. andbullet; Do not bind or staple the applications. Secure them with rubberbands or paper clips. andbullet; If continuation pages are required, please use standard-size (8\1/2\andmin16;andmin16;x11andmin16;andmin16;)white bond paper.andbullet; All items on the forms must be completed. Enter ``NONE'' or ``NA''(not applicable) whenever appropriate. andbullet; Do not use covers, binders or tabs. andbullet; Do not include extraneous materials such as agency promotion brochures,slides, tapes, film clips, etc. It is not feasible to use such items inthe review process, and they will be discarded if included. andbullet; All applicants will be immediately notified of receipt and theidentification number assigned to their application. This number and thesubpriority area must be referred to in all subsequent communication withSSA concerning the application. If acknowledgement is not received within30 days after the deadline date, please notify SSA by telephone (301) 965-9500.andbullet; Applicants are advised that SSA staff cannot release predecisionalinformation relative to an application other than that it has been receivedand that it is going through the review process. Unnecessary inquiriesdelay the award process. Once a decision is reached, the applicant willbe notified as soon as possible of the acceptance or rejection of the application.andbullet; All applicants must submit an original and 2 copies of the completedapplication material. B. Content of the Application Each copy of the application must contain a FACE SHEET (SF-424), and becompleted and assembled in accordance with the following instructions:<ITAG tagnum="21">1. Part I, Face Sheet of the application including a project summarydescription; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Part II, Budget Information; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Part III, Program Narrative; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Part IV, Assurances; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Projects which require collaboration or substantive commitmentby agencies of Federal, State, or local governments (e.g., State DDS, StateVRA, etc.) or organizations other than the applicant's organization shouldinclude letters of cooperation. These letters are not part of the narrativeand, therefore, are not counted against the 25-page limit for the narrative.</ITAG>C. Preparing the Application <ITAG tagnum="81">Part I_Face Sheet (SF-424) </ITAG>The following instructions are provided for completing the form:<ITAG tagnum="15">Item 1. No action required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 2. Date application submitted to SSA (or State if applicable)and applicant's control number (if applicable). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 3. State use only (if applicable).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 4. Not applicable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 5. Legal name of applicant organization, name of primary organizationalunit which will undertake the assistance activity, complete address ofthe applicant, and name and telephone number of the person to contact onmatters related to this application. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 6. Enter Employer Identification Number (EIN) as assigned bythe IRS. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 7. Enter the appropriate letter in the space provided. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 8. No action required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 9. No action required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 10. No action required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 11. Select a title that is both short (60 characters or less)and descriptive. Include the subpriority area under which this applicationis submitted. If the application is not submitted in response to any ofthe subpriority areas specified in this announcement, indicate ``non-designated.''</ITAG><T3>Project Summary Description. </T3>Attach a separate sheet of 8\1/2\x 11andmin16;andmin16; plain paper to provide a summary description of theproject. Clearly mark this separate page with the applicant name as shownin item 5, and the subpriority areas as shown in item 11. The summary descriptionshould not exceed 1,200 characters, including words, spaces and punctuation.These l,200 characters become part of the computer database on each project.The description should provide a clear statement of what your proposalis trying to test, accomplish or illustrate, what approaches you will use,and what criteria you will use to evaluate the success of your project.At the end of the summary, list major products that will result from theproposed project (such as software packages, informational materials, screeninginstruments, training manuals or videos) and any restrictions or limitationson its use by SSA. Remember this summary description is limited to 1,200characters. This information, in conjunction with the information on theFace Sheet (SF-424), becomes the project's ``abstract,'' and will be themajor source of information about the project.<ITAG tagnum="15">Item 12. List only the largest political entities affected (e.g.,State, counties, cities). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 13. Self-explanatory. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 14. List the applicant's Congressional District and any District(s)affected by the program or project. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 15. Amount requested or to be contributed during the first funding/budgetperiod by each contributor. Value of in-kind contributions should be includedon appropriate lines as applicable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 16. Applicants should contact the State Single Point of Contact(SPOC) for Federal Executive Order 12372 to determine whether the applicationis subject to the State intergovernmental review process. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 17. This question applies to the applicant organization, notthe person who signs as the authorized representative. Categories of debtinclude delinquent audit disallowances, loans and taxes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Item 18. To be signed by the authorized representative of the applicant.A copy of the governing body's authorization for you to sign this applicationas official representative must be on file in the applicant's office. Ifthe authorized representative is not available, an individual authorizedto act on his/her behalf may sign as ``acting for'' the designated official.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Part II_Budget Information </ITAG>Sections A, B, C, and D should include budget estimates for the first budgetperiod (usually 12 months) and section E should present the need for Federalassistance in the subsequent budget period(s). <T3>Section A_Budget Summary. </T3>Grant applicants requesting assistanceto conduct activities under grant programs administered by SSA are expectedto contribute towards the total cost of the activity. These costs mustbe reflected in the grant application. The budget for the activity mustinclude funds requested from SSA and the applicant's share of allowablecosts. Line l, columns a and b_In column a, enter ``SSA'' and in column b, enterthe CFDA number (13.812). Leave columns c and d blank. Enter in columne the amount of Federal funds needed to support the project for the firstfunding period (usually 12 months). Enter in column f the amount of thecost of the project to be borne by the applicant. Enter in column g thetotal of columns e and f. Lines 2 through 5 and columns a through g are not to be completed. <T3>Section B_Budget Categories.</T3> Use column 1 only. Leave columns2, 3, 4, and 5 blank. Lines 6 a-h_Show the estimated Federal costs for each object class categoryin column 1. <T3>Line 6a_Personnel. </T3>Show salaries and wages only. Fees and expensesfor consultants should be included on line h_Other. In computing estimatedsalary charges, an individual's base salary represents the total authorizedannual compensation that an applicant organization would be prepared topay for a specified work period. The base salary excludes income that anindividual may be permitted to earn outside of full-time duties to theapplicant organization. <T3>Line 6b_Fringe Benefits. </T3>Fringe benefits may be requested as adirect cost to the extent that they are treated consistently by the applicantorganization as a direct cost to all sponsors. As an alternative, fringebenefits may be included in the calculation of the applicant organization'sindirect costs. If a fringe benefit rate has been negotiated with DHHSor another Federal agency, indicate the agency and the applicable rateunder section F. Otherwise, indicate the method used in computing the amountof fringe benefits claimed. <T3>Line 6c_Travel. </T3>Include the cost of travel for employees only.Travel for consultants should be included on line 6h_Other. Under sectionF describe the purpose of any travel, number of trips involved, destinations,individuals who will be traveling, and the projected cost per trip, i.e.,local transportation, air travel, per diem, etc. Include the computationsused in determining the cost. <T3>Line 6d_Equipment. </T3>Include only non-expendable personal propertywhich has a useful life of more than 2 years and an acquisition cost of$500 or more per unit. Under section F, list and explain the need for eachitem of equipment. <T3>Line 6e_Supplies. </T3>Include all tangible personal property exceptthat listed on line 6d. If the total exceeds $500, list and explain theneed for the items under section F. <T3>Line 6f_Contractual. </T3>Include all procurement contracts (exceptthose which belong on other lines such as equipment, supplies, consultantservices, etc.). List each contract, the amount and purpose under sectionF. <T3>Line 6g_Construction. </T3>SSA programs do not have construction authoritybut may support limited alteration and renovation costs. Amounts includedunder this category must be fully explained under section F. <T3>Line 6h_Other. </T3>Use for all direct costs not clearly covered bylines a through g. Examples are computer use charges, consultant costs,and equipment rentals. Amounts entered under this category must be itemizedand fully explained under section F including the method used in computingthe cost. <T3>Line 6i_Total Direct Costs. </T3>Enter the total of lines 6a through6h. <T3>Line 6j_Indirect Costs. </T3>Applicants which are State and local governments,enter the amount of indirect costs. List and explain these costs undersection F. Indicate if the costs are claimed in accordance with an approvedState cost allocation plan. Applicants other than State and local governments, enter the amount ofindirect costs. If the costs are claimed in accordance with an approvedindirect cost rate negotiated with DHHS or another Federal agency, includethe name of the agency and the rate under section F. If a rate has notbeen negotiated, list and explain the costs including the method of computation.<T3>Line 6k_Totals. </T3>Enter the total of lines 6i and 6j. <T3>Line 7_Program Income. </T3>Enter the estimated amount of income, ifany, expected to be generated from this project. Do not add or subtractthis amount from the total project amount. Explain the nature and sourceof income under section F.<T3>Section C_Non-Federal Resources. </T3>On line 8, column a, enter SSA.In column b enter the amount of funds or the value of in-kind contributionsto be provided by the applicant. In column c, enter the amount of Statefunds. In column d, enter the amount of funds or the value of in-kind contributionsfrom other sources. Enter the totals in column e. Line 12 need not be completed.<T3>Section D_Forecasted Cash Needs. </T3>Line 13_Enter the amount of Federalfunds needed by quarter during the first year. Line 14_Enter the amount of funds from all other non-Federal sources neededby quarter during the first year. Line 15_Enter the totals of amounts on lines 13 and 14. <T3>Section E_Budget Estimates of Federal Funds Needed for Balance of theProject. </T3>Enter in the proper columns the amounts of Federal fundswhich will be needed to complete the project over the succeeding fundingperiods (in years). <T3>Section F_Other Budget Information. </T3>Use this space to explainamounts for individual direct object-class cost categories (section B)that may appear to be out of the ordinary or to explain the details requiredby the instructions. Attach additional sheets if necessary in explainingand justifying the items. The information provided should include sufficientdetail (including the method of computation) to facilitate a determinationas to the allowability, relevance to the project, and cost/benefit. <T3>Section G_Personnel_1. Personnel. </T3>List all personnel chargeableas a direct cost to the project by title, salary, and percentage of effort.Include names for key positions only. Enter in column 1 the annual (12 months) salary rate for each positionwhich will be filled for all or any part of the year by an incumbent workingon the project. This rate may not be more than that paid by the granteeto other employees in comparable positions or, if the grantee has no comparablepositions, the rate may not be more than that paid for such services elsewherein the community. Enter in column 2 the number of months the position will be filled by anincumbent working on the project. Enter in column 3 the percent of time or effort the incumbent will devoteto the project during the number of months shown in column 2. Enter in column 4 the total amount required, as computed from the informationshown in columns 1 through 3. Use the following formula:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>  <H1>Annual Salary (col. 1) </H1><H1>No. Months (col. 2) </H1><H2>X    12    X </H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="26">Percent of Effort (col. 3)=Total Amount Required (col. 4)</ITAG>2. Fringe Benefits. Enter in the parentheses the applicable fringe benefitrate(s). In column 4, enter the amount determined by applying the rateto the total of the salaries in column 4 to which the rate(s) applies.3. Option for Salary Detail Submission. Applicants may request that thesalary rates and amount requested for individuals not be made availableto DHHS reviewing consultants. To do so, an additional copy of this pagemust be submitted, complete in all respects, except that columns 1 and4 may be left blank. 4. Function/Task Description. Attach a description of the function or taskto be performed for all personnel listed.<ITAG tagnum="81">Part III_Program Narrative </ITAG>The review of grant applications is aided materially when project descriptionsare presented in a reasonably uniform pattern. For this reason, the followingguidelines should be used in completing the program narrative. The programnarrative is not to exceed 25 pages typed double-spaced, or 13 pages typedsingle-spaced and should provide information on how the application meetsthe evaluation criteria in Section III. To facilitate review and evaluation,the program narrative should not be prepared in ``compressed'' type. Pagesshould be typed on one side only of standard-size white bond paper. Eachpage should be numbered consecutively at the bottom beginning with pageIV-1. The program narrative should describe the major issues of concern, theresearch and demonstration methodology to be used in addressing these issues,the evaluation approach, the workplan, organizational capability, implementationpotential and dissemination of results. Review of the narrative will concentrateon the above and on the manageability of the design as reflected in thework plan. Should the proposed project be funded, the information providedin the narrative will form the basis for monitoring the project and evaluatingprogress for future funding decisions, as well as aid SSA in planning forrequired technical assistance and for the implementation and disseminationof project findings.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>A consultant in research design may be useful in preparinga proposal under this announcement. Such a person can assist in respondingto the requirements discussed in the research and demonstration methodologysection, and may be helpful in developing a project workplan and disseminationmethods. Persons familiar with research and demonstration project planningand design often have training in such disciplines as Sociology, Economics,Political Science, Psychology, Statistics, Public Administration, SocialWelfare/Social Work, etc. They are often employed by universities, researchorganizations, hospitals, government research agencies, etc.</ITAG>The narrative should be organized under the following major headings asappropriate (cross-refer with Section III.H.2):<ITAG tagnum="15">A. Project Title and Objectives </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">B. Background and Importance of Project </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">C. Project Design </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">D. Project Evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">E. Work Plan </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">F. Organizational Capacity </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">G. Implementation Potential </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">H. Dissemination of Results</ITAG>The program narrative should be completed as follows: A. <T3>Project Title and Objectives. </T3>1. Select a title that is both short(60 characters or less) and descriptive. 2. Specify the objectives of the project, preferably in short statementformat. B. <T3>Background and Importance of Project. </T3>1. Discuss the major areasthe project will address and the national significance of these problemareas. Include factual comments on the number of individuals (recipients)affected and the magnitude of the human, physical and fiscal resourcesinvolved in trying to address the problem areas. Discuss the key reasonswhy the areas that the project will address require resolution and indicatehow improvements in current practices, methodologies, interventions and/oradministrative or budgetary management will significantly reduce the problem(s)or improve their resolution. 2. Discuss the state-of-the-art in resolving these problems. Include approachesthat have been or are being used in resolving the problems and the outcomesof these approaches. Also include a brief description of: (1) The organizationalstructures which currently deal with the problems, (2) the services provided,and (3) the administrative methods currently used. 3. Discuss the approaches proposed for resolving the problems includedwith this project and the rationale supporting the proposed resolution.4. If the performance of any of the project activities will be by a thirdparty (e.g., evaluation of the project_see section III.2.(d)), includethe following information: (a) A description of the activities; (b) A justification for their performance by a third party; (c) Estimated costs and time schedule; and (d) A description of the qualifications of the organization or individualto be selected and the method of selection.5. Summarize important results obtained by others which are directly relatedto this project, citing publications where applicable. It should be apparentfrom the summary that existing literature has been critically reviewedand that related programs being carried on elsewhere are known to the applicant.6. Cite the most important publications and presentations of the projectstaff on this or closely related work. If none, list the most importantpublications in other related fields over the last 5 years. <T3>C. Project Design. 1. List the objectives/hypotheses to be tested.Make them clearly relate to the objectives of the priority area(s) chosen.For example, if the priority area requires that the project be designedto return disability beneficiaries to SGA, the basic hypothesis shouldbe that the proposed treatment will return more beneficiaries to SGA. </T3>2. Describe the proposed approach for testing the objectives/hypotheses.If a comparison of a new treatment with a current program is indicated,a treatment and control group structure needs to be established.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> In some instances, a hypothesis testing methodology maynot be appropriate or feasible for projects. In such cases, the researchand demonstration methodology must be explicitly described including adetailed <T3>explanation</T3> of the methodology to be used for conducting the projectemphasizing the procedures and methods to be used in determining projectimpact.</ITAG>3. Indicate the <T3>size</T3> of the proposed sample and describe the process of identifyingthe sample size in light of the hypotheses to be tested. Include an explanationof how control and comparison groups will be formed, the intended numberof subjects and how group size will be determined. Explain how the samplesize will be sufficient to detect differences between the treatment andcontrol group in the project, e.g., indicate the statistical power of test.  4. Explain the proposed method for sample selection. Describe the processof acquiring eligible subjects. Describe the process of selecting a controlgroup of subjects identical to the treatment group. Describe any incentivesused to encourage subjects to participate. Indicate if SSA (either on anational or local basis) and/or the State DDS or State VRA is to be involvedin assisting with sample selection and the nature of this involvement.5. It is probable that an observation period which is longer than the treatmentperiod will be required to test the hypotheses. Discuss the length of thetreatment and observation periods and describe how the length of your observationperiod will be sufficient to gather the necessary data for your hypothesesto be tested. Describe how contact will be made for gathering data duringthe pre- and post-treatment observation period, e.g., mail contact, phonecontact, personal contact, employer follow-up, etc.   6. Discuss potential problems that may arise and how they will be resolved,e.g., describe how dropouts, inadequate number of referrals, etc., willbe handled (see especially section III, H.2.(c)). <T3>D. Project Evaluation. 1. List the data to be collected. Explain howthese data will be used to test the hypotheses. Discuss specifically howthe data will be analyzed. Identify the data that will be supplied forfurther evaluation by SSA. For project findings that are not suitable forhypothesis testing, describe in detail the evaluation methods to be usedindicating the types of outcome information expected and how this informationwill be analyzed. Provide a comprehensive description of the evaluationmethodology as detailed in section III, H.2.(d).   </T3><T3>E. Work Plan. 1. List and describe each task (at least one paragraphper task) that must be completed to carry out the project. (Most projectsshould have between 10 and 20 tasks.) </T3>2. Specify the product(s) for each task that can be provided to SSA onrequest as proof that the task has been completed. 3. Prepare a Gantt chart showing the start and end dates for each task.Include milestones such as: andbullet; Onsite acquisition of staff; andbullet; Physical acquisition of facilities and equipment; andbullet; Pre-test of measurement devices; andbullet; Establishment of linkages with ongoing programs; andbullet; Acquisition of subjects for testing; andbullet; Signing of agreements and contracts; andbullet; Arrangements with public and private agencies to provide services,data or other support; andbullet; Steps to involve potential users; andbullet; Initiation of project test, intervention or measurement/data collection;and andbullet; Dissemination of final report. 4. Show the level of effort in work-months (by project personnel, if possible)required to complete each task. 5. Indicate the formats for the interim and final progress reports to besubmitted to SSA. 6. If an independent sub-contractor is to be used for any part of the project,include the scope of work to be performed by such contractor, the tasksto be completed, a time chart for such tasks, and the products to be providedby the sub-contractor. F.<T3> Organizational Capacity_Project Staff and Facilities. </T3>1. Includea <T3>project staff </T3>organization chart and, if applicable, show thelinkages with State/county organization charts. Note that the Project Directorshould be full-time or devote a substantial portion of his/her time tothe project. Indicate the specific project responsibilities of each keystaff member and show how much time each will devote to fulfilling theseresponsibilities. 2. Staff Qualifications_Include a biographical sketch (<T3>not reandCx.174;1sumeandCx.174;1s</T3>) of the proposed Project Directorand other key project staff, highlighting special qualifications that relateto the accomplishment of project objectives, such as education and experience.For each of the key staff not identified at the time of application, provide(in lieu of a biographical sketch) a job description, qualifications soughtand a projection of how long after notification of grant award the recruitmentof these staff will require. 3. Discuss other qualifications of staff or of organizations affiliatedwith the project that enhance its potential success. 4. Describe the facilities where the activity will be conducted and thelocation (including computer capability and specialized technical equipmentwhere relevant). Provide a brief explanation of the suitability of thefacilities and/or the acceptability of the technical equipment for accomplishingthe objectives of the project. <T3>Organizational Capability Statement. </T3>Provide a brief (maximum2 pages double-spaced or one page single-spaced) background descriptionof how the applicant agency (or the particular division of a larger agencywhich will have responsibility for this project) is organized and the typesand quantity of services it provides or research capabilities it possesses.This description should cover capabilities not included in the programnarrative under project staff and responsibilities. It may include descriptionsof any current or previous relevant experience or describe the competenceof the project team and its demonstrated ability to produce a final productthat is readily comprehensible and usable. G. <T3>Implementation Potential. </T3>1. Estimate the costs and the benefitsthat might accrue from replication or installation on a State-wide (ornationwide) basis, specifying the assumptions and logic used in makingthe estimate. Provide a description of the specific uses of the projectresults which are directly relevant to the needs of SSA disabled beneficiariesand suggest how the results could be applied to assist beneficiaries. 2. Specify any special features of the target group(s) and the operationalenvironment in which the project will operate that would vary in otherlocations, thus influencing utilization potential, e.g., rural population,minority composition, political climate, governmental centralization ordecentralization, etc.3. Specify how final products will be oriented toward facilitating implementationin other locations. 4. Discuss commitments made by Federal, State or local governments andother organizations to continue the project or implement its findings aftercompletion. H. <T3>Dissemination of Results. </T3>1. Specify the means to disseminatethe results and promote use of these results by others in the field. 2. Identify the specific methods to be used in communicating project resultsincluding the preparation of reports and descriptive materials, presentations,articles and monographs, etc. 3. Describe the audiences to which information will be disseminated indicating(when known) the organizations, associations and meetings where disseminationwill take place. <ITAG tagnum="81">Part IV_Assurances </ITAG>Applicants are required to include Part IV, Assurances, with the grantapplications. Copies of these assurances are reprinted at the end of thisannouncement. A. <T3>Check List of Application Requirements. </T3>Before submitting theapplication for grant support, check to assure that the following itemsare included: Formal application prepared on Form SSA-96, assembled inthe following order:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Part I, Face Sheet (SF-424) has been completed according to the instructions,includes subpriority area in item 11, is signed by an authorized official,and has a project summary description attached; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Part II, Budget Information, sections A, B, C, D, and E are completed;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Part III, Program Narrative, does not exceed 25 pages (or 13 singlespaced) and includes an organizational capability statement not exceeding2 pages; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Part IV, Assurances. </ITAG>Other Forms: Application Certifications (to be completed by for-profit organizationsapplying for grant support):<ITAG tagnum="15">_Certifications Included </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Certifications Not Applicable</ITAG>Mailing: <ITAG tagnum="15">_An Original and 2 copies of the Application.</ITAG>B. <T3>Points to Remember.</T3>andbullet; At least 25 percent of the TOTAL cost for the proposed demonstrationprojects must come from a source other than the Federal government (1 dollarmatch for every 3 dollars requested from SSA). Research projects (e.g.,subpriority area 5.1 and priority area 9, in part) require cost-sharingof 5 percent. An application may be unduly penalized in the review processby careless errors relating to the computation of the non-Federal shareor match. Refer to section III.C. for discussion of the grantee's matchingrequirements. andbullet; Submit an original and two copies of the application. Six additionalcopies are optional, but will expedite processing. andbullet; Designate in item 11 of the Face Sheet (SF-424) the subpriorityarea under which the application is being submitted. If not submitted inresponse to any of the subpriority areas specified in this announcement,indicate ``non-designated.''andbullet; Applications are not to contain narratives in excess of 25 typewrittendouble-spaced pages (or 13 single-spaced pages). andbullet; The project summary description of 1,200 characters or less isan essential element of the application. It is important that the summarydescription accurately reflect the nature and scope of the proposed project.The summary should include a brief description of the evaluation criteriafor determining whether the project is successful or not successful. andbullet; Follow the recommended format as closely as possible in preparingthe program narrative. The format reflects the evaluative criteria whichwill be used by reviewers to evaluate applications. andbullet; Do not include letters generally endorsing the project. But wherecollaboration or substantive commitment by agencies of Federal, State orlocal governments (e.g., State DDS, State VRA, etc.) or organizations otherthan the applicant's organization is involved, include letters of cooperation.andbullet; The qualifications of key staff should be described in a few paragraphsrather than in formal vitae. Vitae or reandCx.174;1sumeandCx.174;1s are notto be provided and will not be included in the applications provided toreviewers. andbullet; Although multiple applications (of different concepts) from thesame applicant are not prohibited, they are not encouraged. andbullet; The activities below generally will not meet the purposes of thisannouncement<ITAG tagnum="15">_Projects whose main activity is a conference or meeting; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Projects whose major product is a manual; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Proposals which request expansion or continuation of existing servicesor programs; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Proposals which would establish clearinghouses; or, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Projects which are not within the goals and objectives of this announcement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4190-11-M019</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-7911 Filed 4-5-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4190-11-C</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>